Oh. My. Gosh. I loooove Tootsie's!!! The boy&I wanted brunch, so we came over on a Saturday morning. I love the outdoor seating because you can look at the mini lavender field [and... the construction over at Stanford Hospital, but that didn't bother me too much]. Anyway, we went inside to order, and I got the scrambled eggs with sausage/potatoes/pancetta and the boy got the Tootsie's Burger [veal/pork/beef burger] and a coffee. We also got a filled Bombolini. We asked if we could get butter on the croissants, and were told that there was already butter in the croissants, so we said we'd get it. After we ordered, we headed outside with our number and just hung out until an employee brought us our food. Like others have said, you get your own utensils/water/etc. The Bombolini came out first and mannnn it was delicious!!! The texture is suuper cool, and the lemony filling wasn't too sweet. And then our main dishes came out. We didn't talk for a solid 5 minutes because the food was so delicious! The eggs were scrambled perfectly [fluffiness galore] and the pancetta/potatoes combination was off the hook! The sausage was also really yummy. I had a bite or two of the boy's burger and I liked it a lot as well. The quality of their ingredients is very apparent. We thought we ordered a buttered croissant as well, so we stopped the employee and asked him about it, and he went in and came back out with another Bombolini. We asked him to check again, and I guess the girl didn't hear that we ordered a croissant, and thought we were just asking about whether or not we could get butter on it. Oh well. At least we got the 2nd Bombolini? :P Anyway, the boy went back in to get a regular croissant, Nutella croissant, and 2 Bombolinis for his family, and they loved everything! I had a bite of the Nutella croissant and yummmm! Super delicious. The only thing is, everything is quite pricey, and trust me - when you're ordering, you're going to want to try EVERYTHING, so just be warned! I can't wait to come back though... I've been dreaming about the Bombolini since my last visit!
Usually after our OB appts at Stanford, we head over to California Cafe for lunch. Though, we've had a number of earlier morning appts lately... so we decided to gift Tootsie's a go! Mmmm... my 4 star rating is on the Hot Chocolate alone!! OH. MY. GOODNESS. Hot Chocolate should not be so good! It is truly a wonderful 'drinking chocolate'. I, also, really like the sweet cashier dude & knowledgeable cook guy in particular. We have only been in for breakfast... when Hot Cocoa is a perfect addition to my eggs. Breakfast is nice and small... nothing too fancy. And French Fries are not available until lunch service at 11am. Note : Our first visit included the Egg & Pancetta Panini... the egg whites were raw & when hubby took it up to inform the female cashier/barista, she asked 'Do you want me to take it back then!?"... "...YEAH!"... this was witnessed by the male cashier, whom knew that raw egg whites are just not right and he said "Yeah!" at the same time. Regardless... we will likely return a few more times!
(review based on service performance -- was unable to evaluate quality of food) I went to Tootsie's on a recommendation for business catering from a colleague at Stanford. I had originally tried emailing them multiple times, but it seems as if their listed email address has a permanent bounce-back ( info@tootsiesbarn.com ). Then I thought it would be wise to actually taste the quality of the food before placing my order, so I visited around 3:00 on a Wednesday for a late lunch. When placing my order, I asked if anything else came on their "Carne alla Pugliese" sandwich. The menu board stated, "Slow roasted beef short ribs served on a sfilatino roll topped with pecorino cheese."  The cashier asked the cook and then relayed  that carrots, onions and slaw also came on top of it.  I asked to just have the short ribs and cheese separate, without the additional unlisted toppings. When offered chips or salad, I chose their house-made chips, then sat down to wait. When my food was delivered, my request had not been honored and there was a sandwich with nothing I had ordered. The cashier was unapologetic and just handed me my order stating, "So, everything comes in the sauce so we couldn't take it out. Oh. And we ran out of chips." He then walked away. I called for him to come back and let him know that this was nothing that I had ordered, and I was extremely disappointed that he hadn't come and asked me to change my order. He took the plate from me and said, "Your loss." No offer to bring me something different, no offer a refund. Just took my plate away and most likely swore at me on his walk back. I have no idea if this was just an issue with an employee who just wasn't that great (he was proudly wearing a Cal shirt?) or indicative of the whole place. Needless to say, I drove downtown to take my $500 lunch catering order elsewhere.
panzanella salad was delicious, full of taste and textures...yum the fries that come with my husband's burger were pretty great too, but the burger itself was kinda dry I like their terrasse seating in a lavander field, if only stanford wasn't building their hospital during lunch time ;)
Good sandwiches! My favorites are the fortabello and italiano (both vegitarian). The nutella croissant is the best I have had in my life. The service is very nice and efficient. Very pleasant  and shady outdoor seating, but it does fill up fast during lunch time. Since they have started construction across the street to expand the lucile packard hospital, the view is not the best, but the outdoor patio is still intact and you can get a seat outside so that you are not looking at the construction. There is very limited indoor seating and the tables are tiny and crammed next to eachother. Free parking is available if the lots aren't full. I'm giving it 4 stars because sometimes they toast the sandwich too much so it's hard to bite into the focaccia bread. Today the toasting was perfect though. I have tried the mocha which I did not like, but some people really like their coffee. I think it's a little pricey, but not too ridiculous. If you're looking for a peaceful, fast, yummy lunch then check out Tootsie's!
This was a small brick stone building gem tucked alongside the California Cafe (I did have to go inside California Cafe to ask where Tootsie's was). I came here yesterday for my birthday brunch with my family on a Saturday. There are more table spaces (larger square picnic tables) for groups verses smaller round tables for 1 or 2 people indoors. This is not a full service sit-down restaurant where a server comes to your table and takes your order. You order your food items at the register and are given a number. You sit down and wait for a person to come walking by calling out what number the order is. If you want utensils or water you go get it yourself at the filling/refilling station inside. I shared the Le Spinachio salad and the Short Ribs sandwich, which was a perfect amount of food between my fiance and myself. The vegetables were fresh and in both my mother's frittata and my salad fresh peas seemed to be reoccurring. My mother kept telling everyone to try the potatoes that came with her order because she thought they were also very delicious. Everyone seemed to REALLY be enjoying their cappuccino as well (I don't drink coffee). In fact, most of them got a second cappuccino because they loved it so much the first time.  I did also sample the ricotta cheese pancakes which were also good (though my mother and sister seemed to think that it needed more zest to them). Their bombolonis did look good too (they were taken to-go via my cousin) so I will go back and try them one of these days. So while this place wasn't out of the world wow, I think it deserves a second chance for us to return and try other items.
Apparently you have to come REALLY EARLY to nab a zeppole or bomboloni, so I was disappointed to see there were barely any pastries left at 2:30pm on a Saturday. Instead, we decided to order: -Tootsie`s Burger (Veal, Pork and Beef Blended w/ Olives and Oregano, Served w/ Caramelized Onions, Mozzarella Cheese on a Toasted Rosemary Roll w/ House Made Shoestring Fries $9.95): The burger was nice and juicy, but the rosemary in the roll overpowered the taste of the meat. The shoestring fries were thin and crispy, and were a good complement to the burger. Although it was good, it wasn't a dish that you would look forward to eating again. -Frittata Del Giorno (Italian Style Omelette w/ Veggie and Nutella Toast $9.75): Eh.. really uninspiring. The mushrooms on the frittata were good, but the eggs seemed overcooked. The nutella toast was good, but something you can make at home. I would skip this dish. Overall, my first dining experience at Tootsie's was just ok.. nothing I tried jumped out at me, unfortunately. However, I will be back in the future for that zeppole! and/or bomboloni! Parking is ample and the servers are nice, and outdoor seating is available, although it can get toasty out there.
Wish we had places like this in Hawaii. This is just the type of place I love going to when I'm on the mainland. Cute little place, take out or sit down at one of a handful of tables. I had a poached egg with toast and kalamata olives and marinated celery. Fresh, great taste. Wouldn't expect celery in that dish but it's refreshing. Prices are fair for portion sizes.
Cute place to have lunch, and definitely if you're around the medical campus. A great way to break the monotony of all of the other campus dining spots... I'm so over Nexus. Menu is limited to basically salads or sandwiches. I had a tuna panini that had a great crunch from the capers. The burgers looked great, though! If you go here, the zeppoles are a must. Creamy, not-too-sweet filling and a donut-like exterior. Yummmmmyyy. Service is fast. They also have gelato (I think locally made) that I totally regret not trying. I'm curious to see how it measures up with Gelato Classico. Gotta try it for brunch since it looks like the brunch menu is considerably better! Pancakes, here I come!
Saturday 1pm lunch with friends (8 adults, 2 babies)...what a great place this is! Rocco the owner is absolutely wonderful, and he took real good care of us. At first it was hard to find, it's like a hidden gem really...we ended up walking all around the entire complex till we finally found it. Definitely worth the search. I had a spinach salad with chicken, very nice presentation. Chicken (chunks) was wonderfully cooked as well, juicy but not overly so. The green peas were a nice surprise in the salad. Hubby had the burger, which he enjoyed even though it was more thoroughly cooked then he would get a beef burger..Theirs is a mix of different meats so I'd think you have to cook it a little better..but he did enjoy the taste and wasn't disappointed...yummy fries as well... Dessert...go for the Tiramisu...while they may not be too attractive at first in little plastic cups, they are DELIGHTFUL...highly recommend it! Coffee...we both had an espresso...OMG...you can tell the owner is Italian! You get a proper espresso here for sure! Oh and all the waitstaff seemed very happy and friendly here... Too bad it's far from us, otherwise we'd be here weekly!
I ordered the Ginger Beef Salad and it was really good. There could have been more beef and a little more flavor but I liked how everything came together very simply and aesthetically pleasingly. My father ordered the crab sandwich which was too oily, the mac and cheese which he really liked (I guess I like the cheap stuff because this didn't do it for me) and the cole slaw which had a lot of carrots. I'm not a huge carrot person but I'll admit, their cole slaw was really good. Service was a little slow and we had to ask for bread after seeing the other tables all have it.. had to ask twice actually. Would return on a nice day since they have outdoor seating.
We had a pretty disappointing brunch here today.  The outdoor seating is nice, but it was very crowded when we were there (around 11 AM on Saturday) and we had to wait awhile to get a table, and then it took them forever to come clean it off.   My fiance had the pollone sandwich (around $9).  He was not very impressed with it.  He's pretty easy to please with food, especially sandwiches, but he said it was just underwhelming overall.  He left half of it over, which is rare for him. I wanted to get a nutella or regular croissant, but they were all out of croissants (on a Saturday an hour after they open?  seems very odd), so I ordered the frittata and nutella toast ($9.75) which came with a side of potatoes.   When I ordered it, I asked what was in the frittata and he said "peas."  I then specifically asked if it was vegetarian to confirm there were no ingredients other than peas and he said yes.  Imagine my surprise when I got the dish to discover that although the frittata was veg, the potatoes had huge chunks of some kind of pork (pancetta, I believe) in them.  You would think if someone asks about part of a dish "is this vegetarian?" you would alert them to the fact that the whole dish is, in fact, not vegetarian.  The frittata itself was really disgusting.  I only managed to eat half of it.  It was gloopy and congealed and the only taste was oil.  The nutella toast wasn't bad, because, hello, its nutella toast...even when its bad it still tastes good.  But the bread was stale and it was pretty dry.   I could easily make better nutella toast with bread bought from Safeway.  I gave the potatoes to my fiance and he said they were ok. I also ordered a single shot moka dark chocolate ($3.50), which was very good.  It had a really rich, dark chocolate flavor and I really enjoyed it.  If someone wanted to come back here, I would stick to drinks and maybe try a pastry, since we were so unimpressed by the savory food. I do not recommend this place for vegetarians/those with food allergies as they don't seem very sensitive to dietary restrictions.  We found the food to range from bad to mediocre and the prices are probably slightly higher than average for the area.  Definitely not a repeater.
My daughter brought me here the other day, because it reminds her of our trip to Italy many years ago. I must say it is a very authentic little slice of Italy, tucked away at Stanford Barn. Delicious panini, salads, gelato, and genuine espresso. Very nice.
I have been coming here since 2009. Whenever i have friends or family from out of town I always bring them. I've had everything on the menu and you honestly can't go wrong. There is something for everyone and it is good quality stuff. Mr. Rocco is very sincere with his ingredients and also brews Mighty Leaf tea and Danesi coffee.
Went again this past weekend to meet up with some friends.  Once again very impressed with their menu.  This time I got to share the goodness with my hubs and he thoroughly enjoyed his sandwich.  I ordered the breakfast panini (tasty) and it came with a salad and potatoes (both also very tasty).  It was a lovely outing for our little family leaving our bellies very satisfied.  Thanks again Tootsies!
Selection of food is impressive. All of the sandwiches looked amazing.  I had the portobello panini... Read more 
Vegetarians beware the potatoes have pancetta in them. We figured this out when we were almost done. I went to the owner and said that they should just note on the menu that there is meat in the potatoes. He and the girl who takes the orders told me that "it really is not that big of a deal" and that we should have told them we were vegetarians. Their attitude was very flippant. Also there is not enough room on the menu to state so. I simply went to give a suggestion. I was not asking for a new plate of food or for money back. So to be told that as a customer was very shocking. While the pancakes were good, we will not be returning. We might have gone back had we been treated a little better.
Just had lunch there today.  I took the eggplant panini. It said in the description grilled eggplant, but it had so much oil! There was mostly OILY eggplant, a few tiny pieces of red pepper and unnoticeable cheese. Very disappointing. I hardly ate half. And the price? ridiculous. There are so much better places on campus or close by.
cute place, lovely outdoor seating. food is good and fresh.
Please take your porchetta sandwich off your menu, since you never seem to have it, and you never can tell your customers when you plan on having it.  Doesn't sound like a menu item to me.  It sounds like torture!
Thank you yelpers for recommending this place. After my appointment at Stanford, I was starving, so my husband and I headed here for lunch. This place is hidden in the back area of the Stanford Barn. If I wasn't a woman on a mission to find it, I would have missed it and gone somewhere else. The inside is really small. I recommend coming here either by yourself or with one other person, but this place is not good for large groups. The tables are small and seating is limited. The food was Italian based fare. I had an arugula/tuna salad which was pretty good. My husband had a pork sandwich, which was fantastic.... especially on a rainy day like today. I was super impressed with their coffee drinks. I just got the drip which had a nice smooth taste to it. Not overly acidic. My husband got the cappuccino, which was also very good. The service was okay but you just pay, and self serve set your table (get your own water too). Other than bringing you your food (after they give you a number), there isn't much interaction there. As far as value, I would say that for Palo Alto, it's pretty good. For about $12 a person for lunch and coffee, we left pleasantly full. I'll definitely be back. Update: We came back on a sunny day and there is a lot more outdoor seating when the weather is nice. I still wouldn't bring a huge group here. Maybe 4 people tops. Just make sure to sit in the back. We sat in the front of the building and got a bunch of dust/smells from the construction site across the street. I still think it is worth it. I'm in love with their coffee!
Tootsie's is a great brunch find! The store is a bit on the small side with only about 6 tables so you are pretty cramped inside. There is some seating on the patio as well, which is lovely on a nice day. I love being able to see the chefs at work -- the kitchen is completely open -- you can see everything they are doing behind the counter! Major accountability ;) The food itself is delish! I have been here twice now -- I personally like their lunch items more. I had this amazing brussel sprouts salad the first time. I tried the ricotta pancakes the second time, but did not think they were as great as people tend to say. I love love pancakes and these were a bit on the dry side. What I love about Tootsies is the menu changes, but they also keep the "classics." If I want brunch in the South Bay, I would definitely swing by Tootsie's!
While all of the components of their spinach salad were delish, there wasn't much chicken or mushrooms. After a little digging through the spinach, I was able to find some small pieces.
We were looking for a brunch place to go on Saturday in the south bay. This place came high up in the list on Yelp for brunch places in Palo Alto. The place looked bigger on the outside, but when we got in, it was super tiny, especially there were only maybe 5 tables inside and the tables were miniature sized. :) We ordered the salami sandwich, frittata, a croissant (since they looked so good and literally were calling my name), beignets and coffee. The sandwich and frittata were pretty basic, nothing too impressive. The beignets were also quite mediocre, but at least they didn't suck. However, the star of the meal was the croissant. I know a good croissant when I have one. :) The kitchen seemed pretty busy during brunch hours, hence, the service was minimal, it was mostly self-served anyway. Next time if I ever go back to this place, most likely I would just order the coffee and croissant, then I'd be happy.
This is such a neat spot. Located in the historic Stanford Barn (which was once a winery where Leland Stanford made wines from three acres of vineyards, the same three acres that are now occupied by the Stanford Shopping Center, up until Prohibition shut down his winery), Tootsie's now takes up a small corner of history. The restaurant itself is quite small, with a decent number of tables both indoors and outdoors. The dishes are already prepared, or else are prepared quickly, and you never have to wait long before your bite is ready. Service is very friendly and helpful if you need a bit of help over some of menu items. The menu is pretty limited, and tends to consist of light Italian-inspired fare; that said, while the menu is short in quantity, everything on it is extraordinary and is certainly vastly made up for in quality! (And, let's face it, I think we'd all prefer to have a smaller number of items that are wonderful instead of a long list of lackluster items.) My favorite is the sopressata sandwich, which features sopressata salami along with an extraordinary truffle cream and fontina cheese, all spread between two pieces of focaccia bread. It's just bursting with flavors, and it an extraordinary experience! This includes a side salad, and is available for all of $8! Tootsie's is definitely a good option when you're on the run, and need something tasty, cheap, and quick!
Service: ordering a bit hectic / owner is friendly / staff is young, energetic but helpful Food: 1. Portobello, prosciutto, salami, etc.  paninos are great, the fries are skinny and crisp. The salads are simple yet savory. 2. Nutella croissant is perfectly flaky and rich. 3. Ricotta pancakes are fluffy and not too sweet, but I'm not the biggest pancake fan. 4. The veal hamburger hits the hangover morning crave. Ambiance: lavender fields / beautifully restored barn / exposed brick My go-to brunch place, except not on Sundays :( not open.
I came here on 28Dec to meet a friend for lunch. I called twice beforehand to see if they were open, and no one picked up either time. Lo and behold upon arriving, the place was closed, and there was a sign on the door saying that they'd be back after the winter holidays. Three other groups of people came by over the next 15 min and were all disappointed. At least leave a message on the voicemail if you're on holiday break. Or maybe update the website (oh look, it's COMING SOON).
Delicious croissants, roasted veggie frittata and torta di riso (risotto cake, pancetta, swiss chard, pecorino romano cheese)! The torta was HUGE for $45, definitely feeds more than 6-8 people. Unless that was the only thing those 6-8 people are eating. It's super comfort food-ish, pretty rich... But so good! Frittata was nicely herbed and vegefied. Yup I just made that word up. Croissants were delicious! I wasn't expecting to like the savory ones (proscuitto cotto and fontina) but they were really gd! The crema pasticceria croissant was also delicious, wish there was more cream but probably better (healthwise) that there wasn't. Croissants were very fluffy and slightly chewy, crisp on the outside. Can rival the ones I had in Provence! Seating space is kind of limited, especially inside. Outdoors is gorgeous though.
I never even knew this place existed because it was so far down from the Stanford Mall area. When a gf decided to get brunch here, I was just generally surprised that this place was even here and sort of had a hard time finding it. This is a small, barn / brick kind of building behind the Stanford Barn "shopping plaza" with reasonable amount of parking but lots of construction nearby. This is more of a serve yourself kind of deal where you look at the menu, order and then they bring the food to your table with the right number. This is NOT my idea of a brunch place! They hardly serve any kind of egg dishes and the ones they did serve were ok. Mine came with a nutella toast, kind of creative but generally ... meh. The potatoes were extremely dry. Like I didn't know potatoes could be that dry kind of dry. Almost like they were dried potatoes or freeze dried ... or something. The food was ok, not too pricey for a brunch egg plate and a fresh squeezed orange juice (around $14) but the tables are TINY inside and the outdoor seating was just ok. I don't know I'm not a huge fan of this place.
Excellent sandwiches, awesome place to have lunch especially when it's warm and sunny outside. There's plenty of patio seating and umbrellas. I went Yelp-less on this one and had a Tootsie's burger, which is essential a burger with a veal patty (YES veal, instead of a traditional patty) - delicious! I usually prefer having anything over a burger, but Tootsie's is an exception. Highly recommended. It's pretty close to Stanford shopping center and literally few steps from the hospital. PHOTO: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ? select=eIuwL_GcYgCSi6eh3ugxsw
Great Sunday hangout spot. Mediocre food! The salad I had was okay for 9.50 The focaccia came with it was tasteless and cakey! Quite terrible! Coffee was not bad. (I am spoiled by Philz, BlueBottle and CBTL)
Came here for lunch, split the short rib sandwich and Tootsie's burger with the hubby. It was average, nothing to write home about. The burger patty is a mix of three different types of meat and it is pretty heavily seasoned with herbs. It was unique, but not really to my liking. There were other enticing options on the menu I'd love to come back and try. Everything sounded so good, it was hard to choose what to order. What I really wanted to try was the zeppole and bombolini, both of which were sold out by noon on a weekend. Gives me that much more reason to come back I guess! This is a nice casual spot for lunch. The outdoor seating area is great and the building has a lot of charm. Even if you're not super hungry, it's a nice place to stop for coffee and a pastry.
Grace C said it best: Saturday brunch at Tootsie's was UNDERWHELMING. JF and I sat outside. You order inside at the counter, receive a number, and then wait for them to bring you the food once its ready. Everything on the chalkboard menu looked good. I ended up selecting the veggie frittata + nutella toast ($10.75) and a cup of drip coffee (listed on the board for $2, but I think the girl at the register rang me up for $2.25. Refills are $0.75). Based on the description of the frittata (and what I know about frittatas), I thought the dish I ordered would be fluffy and full of vegetables. This was not the case. What I got was a small (say 5in diameter), thin (less than 1/2in thick) disc of egg with barely any veggies inside (there was some parsley and a sliver or two of onion/leek or something). The top of the frittata had a thin congealed crust of cheese. So disappointing! The rest of the dish was unremarkable-- a potato/bell pepper/bacon hash and the nutella toast (dry). Way overpriced for what it was. JF ordered the breakfast panino for $8.75 and that looked pretty good, but she didn't finish... telltale sign of non-deliciousness? OVERALL: I wouldn't return for brunch. Way overpriced, mediocre food. I'd be willing to give Tootsie's another shot at lunch (sandwiches/paninis/etc look promising). PS - They don't have any hot sauce :(
We love this place, they have amazing lattes, capuccinos etc. The service is phenomenal and the owner is extremely hospitable. I'll be coming back for years to come.
I've been here quite a few times with my walk buddy.  We come here for breakfast or lunch on days when we go for a walk at the satellite trail.  I have had their breakfast panini sandwich, bumbline? (w/ lemon custard), ricotta pancakes, latte, mocha, pulled pork sandwich, and tuna sandwich.  The panini sandwich comes with a side of salad and is filling.  I think the type of bread they use might be ciabata but I am not sure. Most of their food is good.  Their prices vary depending on what day you do.  Weekdays are a little cheaper than weekends. There are outdoor seating and it gets busy during lunch time.  Make sure to have a friend save a table while another goes in to order. For their coffee, there is a $.75 cost for refills. I thought that was stupid since the cup they give you is quite small.  I don't know how serious they are in enforcing it.  My friend sneaked in a second cup and they didn't say anything.  However, I don't think the staff saw it. Overall, I like this place because it's not that expensive and I like the quality of food.  Their ingredients are fresh.
My review is for the brunch on Saturdays.  Tootsie's has to have the best breakfast in the South Bay - unfortunately the bar isn't set very high with places like Bill's Cafe or Hobee's around.  I love the potatoes with pancetta and red peppers, so much better than plain old hashbrowns - heck I can make those at home!  I'd be hard pressed to choose a favorite item off the menu, but definitely don't be frightened by the combination of olives and celery with your poached eggs.  The croissants with marmalade are also worth a mention if you just want a coffee and pastry. Speaking of coffee,they serve Danesi which is imported from Rome.  I'm one of those people who usually likes a ton of sugar and milk in my coffee, but the roast is so well balanced you don't need any sugar.  They also make a tasty cappuccino. Rocco's always very friendly and will occassionally hook us up with complimentary zeppole.  Definitely get there at 10am when they open because the seating fills up quickly and it is rather cramped if you get stuck inside.  I may not be remembering this correctly but the building is the old powerhouse for The Barn, hence, the tight quarters.  During the spring and summer it's wonderful to sit outside, soak up some sun and enjoy the smell of lavender.
Tootsies is my go to place to bring friends visiting Stanford form out of town. They have awesome salads, my favorite being the arugula, octopus, barley salad.  It caused me to fall in love with celery again. Major bonus is that they have lots of veggie options, which is important to my  veg friends.  Second bonus is the big tables with umbrella's for shade. There is not much in terms of service.  Be prepared to find your own silverware,  water, and napkins, but all of the above are easy to find.  Also, beware the sandwiches/panini come on massive sandwich rolls that can be quiet dry and tough.  Too much bread, not enough sandwich.
PROS: + Great Breakfast/Brunch place + They care about food (can taste it) + Hot Chocolate + Sausage and peppers CONS: - Closed on Sunday Came here for brunch on a beautiful morning Saturday. We decided to sit inside because we didn't want to look at the ugly construction site that is across the street at the Stanford hospital. Here is what we got and what I thought: Ricotta pancakes w/ fruit and syrup - solid pancakes, but was left wanting something savory. Sausage and peppers w/ onions and scrambled - Scramble was perfectly down, moist in the center. Sausage looks homemade and the flavor is wonderful. I could eat a plate full of just that. This one I will order again. Hot chocolate dark chocolate - WOW! Dark and rich hot chocolate, how a hot chocolate should taste. This ones was awesome! Latte - Nice and strong, the place is Italian, they like their coffee. No surprise here. Bomboloni - essential an Italian cream filled donut. The dough is nice and dense, but soft and the cream is very nice. I like this one and would order it again. Zeppole - Italy's version of the donut hole, but slightly moist in the center. Great with coffee. This place knocked out of the park. Every dish and item we got was prepared with care. It clear the owner and the chefs here take pride in the food, and it shows in how everything tastes. Tootsie's is now my go to place for breakfast/brunch. Come check it out for yourself. Salud!
Definitely one of the cutest places to grab lunch or a morning snack if you are in the area. I had no idea that there was a lunch place right behind Stanford mall. Tootsie's is supppppper small on the inside. Great if you are just having a coffee or bombolini after a morning run, not so great for groups or at peak eating times. Normally I just grab one of the sandwiches in the display and have them warm it up. Glad that they have shoe string fries, but I wish they weren't so thin that you can't taste any potato.
Small, cramped and food wasn't all that and I won't be back real soon if ever. I was across the street at Stanford and walked over to the Stanford Barn and found this itsy bitsy teeny weeny place. I was really hungry so I settled for this place. I ordered something I saw in the counter window. It came with a salad and I got a Fanta Orange. This set me back $11. I ate my meal and was left wondering...is that all? Toasted french bread with spinach, a few bacon bits and melted cheese cut in thirds. This thing tasted ok but nothing fantastic. The salad had a drizzling of a balsamic dressing and of course the soda was just a soda. Since I was there at about 11:30 am people started drifting in for lunch. Right before my very eyes a line formed right in front of the counter and you literally could not move back and forth in this Lilliputian Tootsie land at the Stanford Barn. No elbow room, too costly and I only ate here because it was the only place around.
I need a Tootsie's intervention. If it was socially acceptable, I would grab as much of their food as I could and shove it in my pockets for later. I'm addicted to the spinaccio salad, homemade focaccia bread and rosemary chips served warm, crunchy and salty when my hunger cravings are at their worst. Ingredients are fresh and dishes are flavorful. My fav lunch spot, and within walking distance to work, which is oh so convenient. Word to the Wise: This is a hotspot for Stanford students, hospital residents and faculty, so make sure you grab a table outside as soon as you pop in.
I always thought this was another extension of CA Cafe. My friend wanted to try this place and I said why not?! You walk in and order at the counter. Their chalkboard menu was a little hard to decipher. I couldn't really tell what was a sandwich or entree or salad. I went with the Tootsie Burger and my friend got the Pollone. Then take your number and go sit down. The food comes pretty quickly. I don't like olives and there were olives mixed in my burger patty. I didn't taste it! There was a strong taste from the rosemary. Very delicious and quality meat was used for the meat patty. I was a little bummed there weren't tomatoes or pickles. The Pollone was so-so. The chicken was still tender and juicy, but the sandwich tasted dry overall. It could've used some pepper or mayo. The shoestring fries tasted just like their homemade chips. I'm not a fan. Seems like brunch would be better.
The food was okay-but not worth the price.  The layout of the tables and chairs were awkward and uncomfortable to seat in.  There isn't much variety on the menu, and they weren't very good at accommodating my dietary needs.  I think this place is best if you have in mind an order that's "to go" consisting of coffee and a pastry.
A little hard to find gem that makes an amazing veal, pork, and beef burger.  We usually don't both get the same thing, but we had to go with what the majority of yelpers were praising and glad we did.  We both loved it.  Comfortable and relaxing vibe sitting outside under the sun.
Went here once with friends for brunch and again with boyfriend for brunch. The first time I got a panini, and it it was very deliciously made. They grill the bread so it is crusty on the outside but still soft in the very center. I think the bread of the panini was the best part of the panini. The pesto sauce in it was very good too, and they put a good amount of salami in (not too much in my opinion -- some sandwich places really overdo the amount of meat the put in the sandwich). The cappuccino is very pretty (the cream is shaped like a heart) but not very good taste-wise. For dessert I got the gelato, and it was very very yummy. You could see and taste the strawberry seeds in the strawberry gelato. They rotate gelato flavors every week or so, so there's always something new to try if you're in the mood for gelato.The second time I got a nutella croissant, which was very delicious as well! PS. This isn't the type of place where they pour water for you, although they do put the food on the table you sit at. There is a counter inside the building, across from the gelato where there is ice water and cups, so you can pour water for yourself + your table. Also seating is scarce on the weekend for brunch, so don't go too late! Once I arrived around 11 AM and it was fine. But by 1 PM, it was getting crowded and hard to find a seat.
Gelato alert.  They just stocked up: they have Strawberry, and also lemon-mint sorbet. affogato with a scoop of fig/almond: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... They use Danesi coffee. Also on tap this summer: chilled soups, like watermellon: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... I tried the rib sandwich: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... It's OK: fall-off-the-bone tender beef ribs, nice and juicy, just enough fat.  It's OK, but I think I prefer the other sandwiches. The zeppole mini-donuts are as good as ever: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... The breakfast panino is awesome: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Don't miss the bombolini, the Italian donut holes filled with pastry cream: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... They come out of the fryer about 7:30 AM, and are gone by about 8:30 AM (you can call ahead to reserve one).
Don't miss the bombolini, the Italian donut holes: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... They come out of the... Read more 
Tootsie's on a roll. Quite a find and quite by accident as Jamie W. and I were on a road trip to Monterey and needed a little nosh before embarking the twists and turns of Highway 17. It's on the edge of the Stanford Shopping Center toward the medical center, and sure enough, it does look like a barn from the outside. What they serve are espressos and small plates influenced by the food from the Emilia-Romagna and Puglia regions of Italy. That's music to my ears because I love the food I ate in the Bologna-Modena area last year. You just order at the counter and park yourself at one of the al fresco tables surrounding the barn. I started my morning with a smooth $4.25 cup of Latte Macchiato (see photo). We shared three things. First was the $4.95 Uova alla Romano, a poached egg on toasted artisan bread covered with olives, celery and parsley and drizzled with olive oil. Simple and good comfort eating. Next were the $5.95 Ricotta Pancakes, so creamy good and not overly sweet with strawberries and just a drizzle of syrup (see photo). That was enough to make me want to throw out my expired box of Bisquick when I get back home. We couldn't help ourselves from their baked selection and dove into their $2.75 Nutella Croissant, just freshly baked and finished with powder sugar (see photo). It was quite relaxing with the sun beaming down on us and hardly anyone else to compete with except a derelict with a shopping bag that kept walking around the barn in his socks. I'm not in Palo Alto much, but Tootsie's is definitely the type of cafeteria-style Italian I like a lot on a relaxing morning to start a long weekend. FOOD - 5 stars...small, modest dishes but uncommonly well done for this type of operation AMBIANCE - 4 stars...ideal on a warm, sunlit morning when you're not in a hurry SERVICE - 3.5 stars...fine, not much to it really TOTAL - 5 stars...like being at a sidewalk cafe in Bologna...but a lot nicer and no Vespas spiting by
I stopped by Tootsie's after a morning of Black Friday shopping.  Forgetting that it was already past noon, I ordered a ricotta pancake.  I was politely reminded that breakfast items are available till 11am.  Faced with a decision, I turned to bombolonis; sadly, they were already sold out. I ended up splitting a scone, side of shoe string fries, and an arancini plate with a friend.  The scone was flaky and buttery.  The sprinkling of sugar and fruit gave it a nice subtle sweetness and alternative texture, delightful.  The arancini was also delicious.  The two large spheres of fontina and mushroom wrapped in rice were nicely crunchy on the outside with a soft creamy center. I've known Tootsie's as the place for a good morning, but now it's also the place for a conveniently located lunch.
I had come here wanting to try their ricotta pancakes.. but they were out by the time we ordered. :( so I got their panini.. which wasn't bad.. but I super prefer my bread soft/easy to bite into.... but these weren't (but that's how panini's are right?).  Overall, the dish was pretty good.. but I would have much rather tried their pancakes.. I saw people eating then... they looked sooo good! I would probably come back to try their pancakes!
Quite possibly one of the cutest establishments I've ever been to. I feel so damn hipster sitting inside the little cottage tables, eating my little burger, popping their little shoestring fries into my mouth. SO HIPSTER. SO GOOD. SO FRESH.
Best breakfast and lunch place around Stanford. The menu is small, great and everything tastes fabulous.  Burger, fries, chips, sandwiches and salads are fresh and home made and on a sunny day you can sit outside. Every morning when I get my double shot espresso, they make the focaccia and the sandwiches which makes me wanna skip the breakfast and get lunch right away.
Wait what? Did I go to the wrong place... ?? Yes, the place is really cute, great for a coffee before work or a lunch break. I came with my friends for brunch-- we ordered the tomato/mozzarella/basil salad, breakfast panini, and tootsie's burger. The tomato salad had about 4 cut up tomatoes, a scoop of mozzarella cheese, and like 3 basil leaves. My friend literally ate a garden for lunch. I got the tootsie's burger and actually thought it was pretty gross. I felt that they just heated up some frozen pork patty and put it on a bun with some veggies. The fries weren't good either. My fries were a lot thinner than the ones I see online. They were around 3 millimeters thick. Don't think I'll ever come back here again, sorry.
This place is great for having a casual lunch with only a small group of friends and is a hidden gem masked by the larger California Cafe next door. The food is pretty yummy (recommend the eggplant pannini, the pollone sandwich for the fried lovers, and their espresso drinks). I would come hungry otherwise the serving size is too much and even despite how good the food is, you simply can't finish it. The only bummer is that because everything is made to order and not mass produced ahead of time, once they run out of an item, it is gone. For example, they didn't have pomegranate green tea and their fried doughballs after the person in line in front of me ordered it. BOO.
Tootsie's was a pit stop on our way to Santa Cruz. Holy balls! We were expecting some basic sustenance to wolf down and continue on our merry way, not gourmet delights that left us moaning in ecstasy! FYI. Coming off Sandhill road you'll see the parking lot for Stanford Barn. You don't see the entrance to Tootsie's until you walk around the building and come to a courtyard with the lovely barn on the right another cafe in front of you. But that ain't Tootsie's. Tootsie's is the small bldg on your right. You can either enter the door facing the courtyard or get the proper view by walking around to the front to see the Tootsie's sign. But take my advice and don't waste your time doing that. Get inside and order asap. You don't want to unnecessarily prolong your wait for their ecstatic edibles (yes, inspired to alliteration). To experience elation: 1. Order at the counter. I recommend the lusciously light, topped with fresh blueberries and syrup ricotta pancakes, the breakfast panino which should be ordered sans panchetta (ham) if you are a lacto ovo vegetarian, and the perfect Perfetto. 2. Get your number. 3. Grab some water. It'll help as you wait for them to bring out your food. 4. Pick your spot at one of the four or five little tables in a 30 sq foot space inside or out on the little terrace, amongst the blooming white flower fields that surround the terrace if the weather's nice. If you don't face Welch, it almost feels like you could be in Napa or Sonoma. 5. Distract yourself as you wait. It felt like an hour passed but it was probably closer to 15-20 minutes. It's definitely all fresh! Finally, when your order arrives, take a hundredth of a second to appreciate the look and smell, then dive in. See if you don't start moaning in ecstasy.
Not exactly sure what all the hype is about. People say that it's "the best brunch in Palo Alto" -- I disagree. To be fair, the setup is nice with the dining outside overlooking the gardens of lavender. On a beautiful sunny day it's quite idyllic. However, the food offered leaves a much to be desired. Ordered the tuna sandwich, which was a little bland despite the capers, and a bit dry (e.g., more mayo). The bread was quite fresh, however. My friend had the burger, which also looked a little dry. Shoestring potatoes weren't bad, but a little greasy. Also ordered the Bambolino with cream filling, which wasn't bad. Not too sweet, which was good, but for some reason, seemed like something was missing from the dough mixture...just fell a little flat on taste. Overall, given the potential of the venue, the food, didn't quite deliver. Would be a great place to have a relaxing cup of coffee or cappuccino on a nice day.
This place is right next to California cafe in a small brick structure that isn't attached to Stanford Barn.  The entrance faces Welch Road. This place works well for either brunch or lunch.  For brunch, the ricotta pancakes are amazing.  The Fritatta is also pretty good and comes with a side of toast + nutella (omg, so much win!). For lunch, I like to get the tuna panino with a side of salad (their fries are pretty good too, just not as healthy). Service is minimal, but friendly.  The outside seating is fantastic (but the lavender does attract bees).
This might be my new favorite brunch spot.  Me and my little guy were doing a mommy-little guy bonding time this morning while Dad played tennis at nearby Mitchell Park.  And because food always makes for a good bonding experience, we decided to hit up Tootsie's.  Ugly weather not withstanding, Tootsie's is like a whole other world with its brick building and an outdoor seating area in the midst of a beautiful garden brimming with flowers and humming birds--it all reminded me of Monet's garden at Giverny. The food made the whole experience perfect.  BTW, service was minimal but friendly and just enough.  I don't think anything on the menu was over $10 so I didn't expect wait staff doting on me.  Anywho, breakfast was a panini of spinach, prosciutto and pecorino, croissant with nutella spread and freshly squeezed OJ.  It was all wonderful and delectable and we almost finished every bite.  The panini was a toasted ciabatta that had just the right amount of crunch and give and the croissant was moist and crispy.  I saw no less than 3 very preggo women in there which is a good sign of great food that satisfy last trimester cravings! We are so coming back.
Chicken sandwich dry and flavors were vague, not interesting. Their tuna sandwich is way better. My friend loved her hamburger! We sat outside in this perfect 75 degree weather, so I decided I was in the mood for a iced coffee drink. I went back inside and said, make me your favorite iced coffee drink. And it was Awesome! It didn't have milk in it, just espresso, sugar, and ice. Perfect. Service always quick and delightful.
LOVE IT. Small place, super unique, and just makes you feel good about living in Northern... Read more 
Wish I had first come when I heard about this place a year ago! Really good food at a reasonable price. Been back a couple times now and my favorite salad is the insalata di tonno (wild arugula, cannellini beans, shaved fennel and tuna). But you gotta try the paninis (cured pork was good, and so was the Italian sausage with broccoli rabe). The side salad you get with the panini is pretty basic (greens and olive oil/vinegar). Your other side option is chips, which I tried once. They were good, but I'm not a big chip fan. Tried the ricotta pancakes everyone raves about on yelp and... meh. Don't get me wrong, they were good pancakes. But I guess I expected more with all the hype. Dark chocolate mocha is super thick and delicious - tastes almost like hot chocolate. My only complaints are the prices are a bit high (but you do get what you pay for) and once the focaccia was stale.
One of the best brunches on the Peninsula. Cozy feel and great food.
This is so close to sis's doctor you could spit....so today when we made our way across the bay...this was our lunch spot. Inside was full...it was freezing...but initially we were happy to sit outside. As the clouds came in, we wondered if we had decided right??!! You order at the counter....we shared a chicken sandwich, and a  salad. We both got a raisin almond biscotti.  The sandwich came with a kind of *slaw*... the meat was yummy, the bread was yummy, but the it was pretty dry. The salad was noting to get excited about, but at least it was not over dressed.  The biscotti was good, but a bit skimpy for the price. I would like to try their pastry...perhaps brunch would be better?? Lunch was good, but not great.
Very unique setting - the exposed brick and beams inside the cafe make you feel like you're in a rustic setting. Order your food at the counter and pray there's one of the 4 tables open inside - otherwise there's plenty of seating outside. The coffee and espresso are good. Breakfast items (I had eggs with spinach and toast) are simple yet flavorful. I'm dying to try the zeppole!
I found my meal (Saturday brunch) at Tootsie's to be underwhelming.  It wasn't bad, but I don't get what all the hype is about. - bomboloni: 3 stars - the ones at the Ferry Building cart are much better - zeppole: 3.5 stars - decent, but they're 75 cents a pop! - breakfast panino: 4 stars - great crusty bread, but my pancetta was 75% fat. plus, the side of potatoes was really boring: not much flavor & no crunch factor either... but then the mixed-in meat chunks were super salty. - burger: 3.5 stars - not bad, but nothing to write home about. the shoestring potatoes were delicious though - super crunchy!
It's a little cute place to grab breakfast.   Lots of good light and a comfy feel inside.    Keep in mind that it's really small inside if you're not having breakfast at the outside tables. However, the guy running register was a little bit of a snot.    When I said, "can I get change for a $10" he answered back by saying, "I don't know, can you?"   I know it's incorrect grammar, but that's no excuse to be an ass.  I'm slightly regretting eaving a tip (which is why I picked up change for a $10 bill in the first place, just on his behalf). Outside of all that, the Americano I had was definitely on the petite side (I'm used to my medium size from Peet's) as well as the tasty but tiny-sized omelette that could scarcely feed a baby.   For a total of $8+, I could've fared far better at Hobee's or Denny's in terms of satiating my hunger. I ended up going to Peet's afterwards to get more coffee....
Very cute place to go for week-end brunch!  I went on a Saturday at 10:30 (they opened at 10) and there was a good selection of tables both indoors and outdoors. For those who don't know, Tootsie's is a stand-in-line,order-and-pay-for-your-food-and-be-served type of place.  It's a fun environment and very, very cute.  On a good-weather day, I would definitely recommend sitting outside and enjoying the ambiance. I know there is a lot of talk here about the zeppole and bomboloni but I thought these were just ok.  The bomboloni is closely-related to a donut with lemon-flavored custard filling and the zeppole is fried dough covered in sugar.  It's good if you are craving donuts but I'm not sure I would order it again.  My party also tried the cranberry scones and those were really good - flaky, flavorful, yummy! For a "main meal", I totally recommend the ricotta pancakes and even crave it as I am writing this review!  Served with strawberries, it is deeelicious!  The asparagus frittata was also good and served with toast (that is served with nutella - YUM!) and potatoes.  The potatoes are cooked with Italian bacon, which adds flavor, but doesn't go well for vegetarians. And most important of all (other than the nutella) - the customer service is great!
This place is a great place for lunch or breakfast, but a little on the pricey side. I really like the food here.  It is very fresh.  Everything here is simply prepared.  No complicated list of ingredients.  Expect olive oil to be a prominent flavor component of your dish.  The panzanella is really great.  I also liked the coppa.  I saw someone get the pollo.  It looked delicious.  I'll have to try that next. The restaurant is very small.  It is more of a lunch counter than a full kitchen.  The baked goods are probably cooked off-site because there is not a lot of room in the kitchen. The outdoor seating is very nice.  You sit in a field of lavender, which offers a nice lemony scent while you are eating.  The only negatives are the busy road and the yellow jackets, who come by to inspect your food. I wish it were slightly cheaper.  9 dollars for a sandwich is pricey.  I feel that 8 would be more fair.  But, it is Palo Alto.  So, what do you expect.  The service is friendly.  But, the place is mostly self-serve.  But, I don't need fancy service for lunch.  I will definitely come back.
Great place to stop and grab a bite. The owner and his wife are friendly and fun and that is a big part of the experience. The menu is diverse as previous reviewers have noted and it changes often. Beware however, if you come in late (esp. for lunch) they may be out of a lot of it. The flip side to this is that day to day the food offerings are pretty fresh. The location is small and it can get pretty crowded during peak times. They also don't have a lot of seating tables can be tought at time
After 5 months on campus, I finally managed to get over to Tooties from the far side of campus for an early dinner during the dead week before holiday break in December. The Tooties staff immediately greeted me and gave me a moment to consider before I took the ordering plunge. I went with the Tooties burger to-go just in case I didn't finish it and found myself a nice table to launch my laptop. Before wrapping up my order, one of the orderers came over to confirm my to-go order as I seemed to be on track to be eating there. An attentive touch to my experience. I had arrived around 30 minutes before closing. After I munching on my juicy burger and shoestring fries, the staff didn't hassle me about the fact that closing time was near. Each of them went along their closing routine and let me stay for an extra 15 minutes before I packed up cleanly and headed along my way. That is my definition of rational, meaningful customer service.
Who knew that there was a cute little restaurant hidden by stanford shopping center?!?! This place is super cute but small. I would definitely recommend sitting outside if it is a nice day and you can find some shade underneath one of the umbrellas. The inside of the place is super cramped and you're likely to bump elbows with people. I ordered the soup and a eggplant sandwich when I came and both were spectacular. I even ended up wearing the soup! Beware of shallow bowls when trying to scoot the soup closer to you for consumption. I ended up spilling about half of it on myself and scarfing down the other half before I split that too.
I hate to rain on anyone's parade, but Tootsie's wasn't everything I expected given the rave reviews. I got some sort of spinach salad with bacon and mushrooms - it was okay, but nothing to write home about. The friend I was with seemed to REALLY enjoy her burger, though. My ice tea was nice, but sort of weirdly grainy and the ice was melted before I even got it, so it was more like lukewarm tea. Ambiance was okay, but sitting outside would probably be much nicer than inside. My favorite thing about Tootsie's was, I'll admit it, the hot employees. Maybe I'll go back for a second try after all...
I've been here at least 10 times in the past few months and still haven't written a review? My bad! I almost always come for a cup of morning cappuccino done right. Their coffee is always perfect, always strong, with just the right amount of bitterness. As for the sandwiches and breakfast dishes: most are 4 star with some (like the poached eggs and ricotta pancakes) reaching a 5 star level. They also have some great scones which go really well with the cappuccino. However, while the coffee is great and the food good, don't forget the ambiance: there is plenty of outdoor seating where you're surrounded by an honest-to-goodness lavender field. If you squint while you sip your coffee and nimble on a croissant, you might believe you're in Provence! The best place to start your weekend!
Great place for a sunday lunch on a sunny day in the summer time. sit outside for a nice breeze and some people watching. Portobello sandwich. so tasty! Poached eggs with potatoes pancetta.  nice perfectly poached egg. tasty dish. Shoestring fries. Crispy n yummy. i'll definitely come back. and possibly order the same dishes. lol. although i hear thei french toast is awesome too.
Small, cheap.  Historic setting, delicious food. I came here for a quick breakfast after a doctors appointment.  After walking though an acre or so of Lavender I approached Tootsies. I ordered the Poached Egg breakfast dish and a cappuccino.
On a warm sunny day where you could be seated outside on their patio to have a coffee or something, yeah I could see how this charming little place could be awesome. Since it was raining, our brunch party of 5 had to sit inside where it's tiny and cramped. The tables resembled stools and were very close together. I ended up ordering the Tootsies's burger because I smelled it on the persons next to us breath. That's HOW close we were. Tootsie's Burger $9.50 - The toasted rosemary roll is delicious, really soft. I like how the roll absorbed the juices from the 3 meat patty. Surprisingly, the 3 meats combined to taste alot like lamb. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) The pomegranate iced green tea $2 was really watered down with hardly any pomegranate flavor at all. Mushroom frittata $9 was more like an omelet. The nutella on the bread was a nice touch. Bacon bits are always money. Not bad. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) Had some macarons for dessert which were done nicely and had the correct texture/filling ratio. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) Even though our waiter had an attitude and not helpful in helping us put tables together, I did like my burger. Tootsie's just wasn't the right place for a brunch with more than 2 people on a rainy day. California grill right next door makes for a roomier and more relaxed brunch option.
If there ever was a five star Italian sandwich shop, this is it. A damn fine, complete lunch with drink will run you about $12. This is easily the best food I've had in Palo Alto and among the best in the world. Hyperbole fits this place. (p.s., the menu on the website is a little outdated) Some of my favorites: The pork rib sandwich is full of savor, flavor, and yum. It will make a fat man out of me. Perfetto: who knew sausage and broccoli pest could be so damn good? Arancini: Fried risotto balls with mozzarella in the middle. The perfect 'salad'. Polone: Always juicy chicken, fried, with bell pepper pesto (mouth watering uncontrollably). I always scarf down every last crumb when I eat here. When you're done with lunch, eat a macaron--delicious, and worth the two bucks.
Great casual brunch spot! Tootsie's at the Stanford Barn is indeed located in a barn, albeit a seemingly renovated and very nice barn.  The location is minutes away from Stanford Shopping Center as well as the Stanford Medical Center and has a low key vibe that makes it a better choice than many of the other dining establishments at either. We came close to noon and still found plentiful seating both inside and out.  You place your order at the front and the menu consists of breakfast items, sandwiches, as well as a variety of pastries displayed.  Beverage choices include a wide selection of coffee and tea and there is also a fridge that houses juices and sodas. We took a seat inside and within a few minutes our order was brought to our table. Potato soup with clams and pancetta - was very surprised at the large bowl size of the soup given the modest price.  Flavor was quite good was well with plentiful clams, lots of tasty pancetta and a just right amount of potato.  Great for cold weather and a hearty serving. Tootsie's Burger - a lean cut of veal and beef is made into a pattie and served on a nice roll.  It wasn't the tastiest burger I've had but great quality ingredients and I loved the included fries. Sausage and Pepper - a simple mix of sausage, peppers, and some country potatoes.  Hearty. We also had some Pelligrino Lemonade and Orangina.  I love that stuff.  Why is it that the bottles are so small and the prices so high (even in a supermarket)? Tootsie's accepts all credit cards, including American Express.
Food so good, it makes my eyes mist and I want to chew a little slower and really savor the food here. Their eggplant parmesan, lasagne, and green salad from their catering menu is divine. The breakfast sandwich is perfection. A better than fresh ciabatta roll, pecorino cheese, a perfectly cooked egg, and prosciutto. Heaven, best I've eaten anywhere. Omelets are light fluffy and perfectly seasoned from the catering menu. Any of the sandwich specials will send you in to orbit. Served with the side of fresh house made chips with sea salt and a hit of crisped oregano leaves, they are the perfect foil for the sandwiches. Best bread I've had since Paris. The coffee at Tootsies makes Starbucks and Peets taste like Denny's coffee from the bottom of the pot at 3am... Don't miss this gem.
It is located in a small brick building behind the Stanford Barn near the California Cafe. When I got there was no sandwich board to tell me where it is. I guess their sign faces Welch Road. The Old Stanford Barn looks like it has been gutted and no Wells Fargo or much of anything left. This review is for Saturday breakfast. They open at 10:00 A.M. on Saturdays which is like a brunch to me. Got there at 10:00 A.M. and the crew working behind the counter looked like they had quite a party the night before and were trying to shake it off and get into the business rhythm. We read the chalked menu of the day and made our selections and found a comfy table outside. Some of the other reviewer's were right as the demographics are young couples with sleepy faces and an older crowd bragging about the results of their most recent MRI's. Lots of free entertainment people watching!  I swore I saw Scott F in the corner! The offerings that looked really good was the Poached Eggs on Toast and the Mushroom Frittata with toast and nutella spread. The food was good and coffee was included with free refills. Sort of funky that they use coffee mugs and saucers (coffee too?) from an Italian firm of Danesi Caffe. Is this a cover for one of their franchises? http://www.danesi-caffe.... Nice place to hang on a Saturday morning, just wished they opened earlier! Have to go back and try one of their gourmet burgers sometime.
We stopped here for bunch on our way out of Palo Alto for a day of sight seeing in San Francisco. It was such a quaint little place with fun and helpful staff. I got the ricotta pancakes and my wife got the chard frittata with homemade strawberry jam and toast. Both dishes were wonderful and we shared a lot! It was a fun atmosphere and the cappuccino was delicious. When we are back in the area we will definitely return!
What a cute place! I came here for brunch (which turned out to be a late lunch) on a Saturday afternoon w/ a friend. I ordered the frittata w/ toasted bread and Nutella and a dark chocolate mocha. While the frittata was decent and you can never go wrong w/ Nutella, the dark chocolate mocha was my favorite part of the meal. Very chocolate-y and delicious! I would come back to try their paninis. -L.
I think if I ever go there again I will shout at the top of my voice, "WHAT SHOULD I GET?" These guys need to chill on the crappy dried oregano. It permeates everything I have ever ordered there. The potato chips, the lamb burger . . . wtf? Chill on the oregano ! The chicken sammy is tasty but dry, whatever slaw is fine but moisture is short with all that bread. Could be miles better. I wish mine came with "bell pepper pesto (mouth watering uncontrollably)." The lamb burger was a huge fail. Oregano dominated. Why? fail I will go one more time at peak and shout at the top of my lungs, "WHAT SHOULD I GET?" meh . . .
SO glad I finally came here after work! Cute cafe at the Stanford Barn (on welch, right across from the hospital, so why haven't I been here sooner?!).  Came here after  a night shift with my coworker.... may have to make it my new thing to do after work!! Have heard about their Bombolini's and finally got to try it out.  Basically a doughnut, fried dough, some powdered sugar on top, and you can have them spread something inside.  The choices I remember was custard and nutella (probably a few other options too- but when I heard nutella I stopped listening).  So I got mine with a nutella spread.  Also ordered a soy latte.  My friend ordered the ricotta pancakes.  DELISH!  will next time get a bombolini AND the pancakes!
I fight Stanford traffic and will wait in long lines at peak hours to patronize Tootsies. It's worth it. The burger is to die for. I thought it was ok before but it's actually amazing now! The tuna sandwich was good, but I'm used to those made at home drowning in mayo which is so gauche I know, so by foodie's standards, this sandwich is probably the bomb-diggity, but it's not my personal fave. I love the salad that accompanies it though. The chicken sandwich is very unique and is also my alternate fave to the burger. The zeppole is awesome when warm. The cute Italian dude who runs the place is super nice and it doesn't hurt that he has a charming accent. I could listen to him talk all day long... sorry, husband. ; ) He also takes the time to smile and coo and ah and my daughter while ringing up patrons. We came once and they were out of zeppole and and whe noticed my disappointment, he gave us a mountain of macroons (they were awesome!) and a creme filled croissant for free. How could we not love this place?!
Thank you to my fellow YELPers :) after reading your reviews I decided to take my girl to a lunch at TOOTSIE's and I am so glad we did. The ambiance was welcoming, the service was superb and their salads were very yummy accompanied with a glass of our waiters recommendation of Pinot Grigio. So the stop off at Tootsie's was a perfect ending to our day at the spa Thank you :)
Too hot for you this week in Palo Alto? Can't see yourself sipping a latte or hot coffee outside in the gorgeous, flower-filled patio here when the temps reach the low 90s on an unseasonably warm October afternoon? Well, Tootsies, as always, has got you covered: granita de cafe: semi frozen lightly sweetened espresso served in an elegant glass ice cream dish w/ or w/out whipped cream. I go sans lactose to better savor the cool perfection of the slightly slushy coffee. So, so good. And you can drink the syrup at the bottom when you are done spooning the brown bits into your happy mouth. shakerato: espresso shaken (not stirred) with ice cubes to form a frothy light brown foam, served in a glass. Nice, better than your typical iced drip. The light foam on top is quite good. The only thing better would be if they served alcohol here and you could add a healthy splash of Disaronno amaretto or Frangelico hazelnut liqueur into the mix. Maybe I'll bring some of my own in a hip flask next time ... affogato: and off-the-menu special, you can combine a scoop of gelato with a double shot of espresso for a really flavorful and satisfying little beverage. Creamy, rich, expressive. A little bit of heaven in a cup. But maybe that's just the caffeine and buttercream talking. San Pelligrino limonata: speaks for itself, really. Cold, citrusy, sweet. The whole package. Come early, come often: Tootsies is redefining the standard of high-quality eating on the Stanford campus. I never take my friends and colleagues anywhere else.
Three simple syllables, but oh so sublime: ge-LA-to. As if things at Tootsie's were not good enough... Read more 
Sometimes, you just want to go to a cafe for brunch but don't want to deal with the guilt that comes with eating a 5-egg scramble and two pounds of potatoes.  Sometimes, you just don't want to think about having to run 15 miles after a gluttonous brunch. And this is the place you come to.  Just the right portion, delicious food, great price, and hello, hot (and friendly) staff! It's a cute cafe with a lot of character.  The place is definitely cramped but I am hopeful that most of their clientele are regular showerers, so maybe there won't be any funky smell within close proximity. We ordered the Italian scramble, ricotta pancake, breakfast panino, and some zeppole.  I was bummed that they didn't have any bamboloni... but that's the misery of life that I have to deal with.  Maybe it'll give me a chance to revisit the cafe... and the cute staff members. For the price you pay, this is a great deal of delicious food.  The breakfast panino could be a little more flavorful, and I wish my Italian scramble could be fluffier, but all in all, I was in love with the atmosphere, and their cute coffee mugs.
So I'm veg.  Pescatarian if you really want to get technical.  And I do eat eggs. Stopped in here for a quick breakfast with a friend.  I decided to order a mushroom (or spinach or something, whatever, it wasn't memorable) frittata which I was told would come with a side.  The exact statement from the guy behind the register was "it comes with rosemary potatoes."  Mushroom(?) frittata?  Rosemary potatoes?  All sounds veg to me, so I order it. When my food arrived at my table, I was horrified to see a giant chunk of bacon on top of my frittata.  There were also many, many chunks of bacon in my "rosemary potatoes." I was thinking, "Do these people think they're funny?" I was able to keep my composure.  I'm not the type to cause a scene over some bacon, but really guys?  Is it that hard to say that they would be "bacon potatoes?" I may come back if I must, but if not, then I won't.
Tootsies: It's a nice tiny get-away place with little chairs and tables outside. Very cute. Just had the Pollone Chicken Sandwich  for lunch and it was just what i needed. Fresh and warm chicken in a perfectly toasted bun with coleslaw that is not the mayonnaise-y type. The chicken breast is super juicy and not what you make think of when you think fried chicken breast. It's freshly done so it's not tough meat at all. I definitely want to get back and try the burger...The pictures for it look amazing
LOVE LOVE LOVE THIS PLACE!! beautiful location, tasty food and best coffee ever....what else we can ask for? :)
I was shocked to have never heard of Tootsie's, as I'm quite a regular in the area. I've been to nearly every establishment on University Avenue, and have certainly exhausted Menlo Park's quaint offerings. Tootsie's was recommended to me by Bradley N. and because of that my expectations were high. I told my acquaintances that we absolutely had to stop here. It had been on my radar for 2 solid days. Some grub was secondary, as I mainly wanted to try the espresso. Having never been here before, we walked into the barn, only to see that it was quiet and empty, with no Tootsie to be found. A gander around the side, past the California Cafe, and there was Tootsie's, with her curved sign standing bright. Happily, I was quite impressed, that such a small shop could offer such warmth and flavor. Three staff members were behind the counter, and they greeted me right away. I asked a bunch of silly naive questions about what the italian espresso drinks were, and got kind answers that set me straight. Customer service is clearly a key ingredient here. I chose a Cafe Shakerato (espresso and sugar, shaken over ice) and a Prosuitto Croissant. I felt it was a great value, considering that the croissant was quite sophisticated, and what was suppose to be 2 shots of espresso ended up seeming more like 3. The croissant was warm on the outside and slightly cool on the inside, so the prosuitto wasn't cooked, but more closely resembling room temperature. It was fantastic that way. It was salty on the inside, and a kiss of sweetness on the outside of the croissant. I was high on my experience there, enough so that I often ignored the fact that my son was crawling all over the floor. Sometimes getting a solid recommendation from someone can make your experience better than if you just stumbled on something at random. Tootsie's will see me again and again, of that I'm quite sure.
What a wonderful find! I came here on a Saturday morning for brunch and was beyond pleased. I ordered the burger and the fries-- the fries were absolutely delightful and full of flavor. The burger was relatively healthy tasting and simple. I did ask for a side of Dijon mustard as I felt it could use some moisture. I had a chocolate croissant to go and was very pleased as well. What a cute little place, full of charm and really nice cashiers/servers. I will definitely be back!
Really not sure what all the hype is around this place...I've been to much better brunch places within PA and other cities. One thing I must give them credit for decor and vibe of the place.  You order and pay at the counter so you don't have to deal with checks at the end. Makes it easier when you are grabbing brunch with a group of friends. I had the poach egg on bread with an olives and celery on top. Never heard of this before so I had to give it a try. To my disappointment flavors were kinda bland so I had to use ketchup to give it some flavor. Also to the Tabasco lovers, they don't have it here! Tabasco and breakfast food usually goes hand in hand! Overall I give them 4 stars for service and ambiance but two for food. For the future I think I much rather head over to Joanie's Cafe for brunch.
nice place with a small inside dining area, and outside area.  Need to come early for lunch, because this place fills up and the space is tight. This place is your basic italian panini, salad, and soup. Insalata di tonno was good 3 stars.  tuna and fennel was good. Sopressata, 4 stars, and the sopressata salami taste homemade. the tea is fine. nice place for a relaxed lunch.  Sit outside on a sunny day and enjoy and with your friends.  This place one good lunch place to goto on Stanford campus.
I needed an excuse to go back to Stanford for lunch after a long morning driving to and from Novato. I thought of going to Tootsies after an accredited fellow Yelper recommendation. First impression: Old world charm I felt like I was in a lil cafe out in the country. The cafe was housed in brick, had a tiled counter, and rustic colored walls. There's a few scattered tables. I went there around 2:45pm and saw they must have finished the lunch crowd because there were newspapers and crumbs all over the floor. They had an extensive menu on the chalkboard above the kitchen. I decided to order: *Single mocha $3.25: rich, first sip of foam but u can taste the richness, perfect for a cold rainy day. *Tootsie's burger $9.50 no caramelized onions and the juicy meat was infused with herbs. Grand Total came to $13.63 after tax And best of all, it was company expense after a long drive round trip from Novato for a seminar. Priceless. Let's save the prosciutto croissant for another day. It'll give me something to look forward to.
cozy place, beautiful location, great price! I went around 1:30pm (no line!, but breakfast ends at 11am) with a friend and we both ordered paninos--portabello mushroom w/ salad for her & zucchini mozzarella w/ chips for me, ~$10 each. Unfortunately, we both thought our meals were a little bland, but at least the salad had just enough dressing & the potato chips were freshly made. The food came quickly and the meal was really fresh, light, AND affordable, which isn't so easy to come by these days. beware, indoor seating is limited (only fits about 10-15 people), so go on a nice day to take advantage of the outdoor seating. i would post pictures, but the existing ones are spot on. the food is exactly THAT visually appealing. Although the food wasn't spectacular, I'd recommend this place & will probably go again. cute place, cute food, cute cashier, why not!
I'm afraid to review this place because than it may no longer become the hidden gem that I've come to love. It's secluded, cute, has great food and good service and outdoor seating. What more can you ask for?! Oh, did I mention that there's plenty o' parking!? Like everyone else has said, the food here is pretty darned good. What's nice about the food is that nothing is "regular" meaning when your order a chicken sandwich you expect lettuce tomatoes and cheese. However, at Tootsie's you get a mouthwatering tender chicken sandwich with a slaw and some capers inside. The Tuna salad comes with Cannellini beans - I mean who would've thought of that?!  The best thing here is there breakfast/brunch. The ricotta pancakes are so fluffy...my mouth just waters thinking about them. Also the Uova alla Romana is such a simple dish but the way the flavors work together is really amazing. Not to mention the breakfast potatoes that come with it are one of the best I've ever had. I love this place so much, I keep begging my husband to come here. It's hard for him to say no because the prices are pretty good - esp. for what you get and the ambiance is really great.  This is a great place for a nice and quiet relaxing breakfast/lunch. It's a shame they close so early, cause I'd come here for dinner too! Two enthusiastic thumbs up for Tootsie's! This place would've gotten the full 5 stars, but the selection here is pretty paltry...you probably would run out of things to order after your 5th visit here. Note to Yelpers: Please don't all come bombarding this place...I like the fact that I can still get a good table whenever I want.
Perfect spot for a cozy brunch on the weekends. We came here for brunch on a Saturday morning since I was looking for places that aren't your typical breakfast dining spots. A quick search on Yelp led me to Tootsie's. Located close to Stanford shopping center and right next to California Cafe, this place was easy to find. It's a quaint little structure with a few tables inside and outside as well, in case it's a nice day. The people were friendly and answered any questions that we had about the menu. We chose: * breakfast panino ($8.75): ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) sandwich with pancetta+fried egg, potatoes, and a side salad * ricotta pancakes ($9.75): ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) pancakes with sliced bananas and strawberries The pancakes were delicious with the fresh fruit. The sandwich bread had a light crunch and the egg was cooked just enough so that the yolk made a nice sauce for the sandwich. I liked how the potatoes had bell peppers and bacon in it. Cute spot for brunch, so come check it out!
I was really tempted to hold off on reviewing this one to keep the masses from finding out about this hidden gem, but who am I kidding, I'm no Ashton Kutcher on twitter. Great food, easy parking, outdoor seating-- ummm could this get any better?  Cute atmosphere, nice people, fantastic bread... apparently it can.  Oh, and somehow, free of annoying Stanford students (sorry kids, I was one once and you'll know what I mean), and free of wheeling and dealing Venture Investors (sorry, colleagues). OH and to top it off, they had a sandwich of my two FAVORITE things: sausage and brocolli (don't judge-- and sorry, there is also something for the 99% of the population that does not love those two things).
After hearing about this place from a friend, I bookmarked it and have been trying to find some time to head there for brekkie. Finally had my opportunity when I met up with some friends. The place is very cute. Love the red-bricked "barn look." Made me feel like I was at a stable...if only I had a pair of riding boots on and knew how to ride a horse... Anywhoo, went inside and ordered a prosciutto and asparagus frittata (~$6). They were out of asparagus so they substituted with mushrooms (the cashier notified me of this change and asked if that was okay). Also ordered a mocha Italiano ($3.50ish), thinking it'd be some interesting Italian spin on a mocha. The cashier asked me if I've ever ordered/had that drink and I replied "no." He then informed me that if I was craving mocha, there's no mocha in that drink so he suggested a regular mocha. What a nice tip! If he hadn't mentioned anything, I'd be definitely unsatisfied with my mocha-less drink and out $3.50! One star for great customer service! We were there around 10ish and it wasn't too crowded. We got a nice seat outside and were served our dishes. The frittata was tasty with some grated parmesan on top and filled with mushrooms and prosciutto; served with toasted bread, cut in quarters and marmalade. I first thought it was pretty small, but then after my mocha and the bread, it was filling enough. Not too much of a heavy brekkie, but not too light. There was plenty of tables outside with umbrellas and tables inside as well. It's a seat yourself type of place so make sure you grab your waters and silverware inside then go scout for a table and enjoy the sun as you wait for your food.
I love this place! It has been on my list for a while and finally got a chance to try it out. It is gourmet Italian food (kinda) at deli prices and setting. Everything we ate from the pizza to the sandwiches to the shoe string fries were awesome. The seating is European style, super cramped with tiny tables. Looks like this is the go-to place for all the doctors in this area. Also heard that they support the children's hospital which is really cool.
If the prosciutto croissant is a mere glimpse of what's in Europe, I'd be glad to go and practice the art of slow living by indulging in coffee and pastries.  Putting literally every croissant that has crossed my path to shame, this proves that they do not have to be dry, hard, or overly buttered.  It can be simply flakey and that itself suffices. Caffe Shakerato really led me into a new experience.  Double espresso with sugar and shaken until frothy.  I didn't know coffee could be like this.  It almost felt like a summer drink I'd use to cool down.  Good enough to sip or gulp. Last but not least is the breakfast panino.  In essence, it's plain.  There isn't a special aioli or bizarre combination of ingredients.  It's simply greens and eggs but the eggs were done over easy and melded into one another and cooked PERFECTLY.  As soon as you bite into it, the yolk will gush out but eat it over your potatoes and you won't feel like it was wasted.  It may get messy though. Now I've never been to Europe but I hear Tootsie's brick ambiance and overall feel is very European.  It makes you want to wake up early on a Saturday morning to just sit and read, or sit and talk, or just sit.  The culture travels transcontinentally and infuses into your soul.
I would come back just for the outdoor seating alone. Quiet, away from busy roads & smog, & plenty of tables with enough personal space so you don't end up overhearing conversations that are TMI. After seeing all the rave reviews and being bummed they don't open on Sundays, I was expecting hoards of people. Much to our delight, there was no wait to order and finding a good table was no trouble at all. Their burger was unique..made of 3 types of meat and came with a side of amazing french fries. The bf had the poached egg that came with a side of creamy and rich potatoes which he thought were good but nothing special. He also said their coffee was orgasmic -- okay fine, not in those exact words but you get the picture. After stuffing our faces, we spotted a review on Yelp claiming their donuts were like little clouds of heaven. Done deal. We brushed the teensy donut holes aside and went with the big daddy -- the large sugared donut. Go big or go home. Perhaps under different circumstances (without a bulging belly) we would've loved it, but it tasted like a pretty standard donut. We made the mistake of saving it, only having the oil soak through the bag within the span of 20 minutes. Sorry donut, in the trash you go. Overall, there are still so many items I am dying to try. I'm praying for another sunny Saturday (leave us alone Winter!) so I can spend a few hours at Tootsie's with a magazine or book.
After salivating over pictures of Tootsie's pollone (fried chicken sandwich) on Yelp, my girlfriends and I headed over to the red barn for lunch. It was perfect day to go - the sun the shining, the birds were singing, you get the idea. Tootsie's is located just steps away from the California Cafe. We learned the hard way and walked all the way around the building. It's all about the patio seating at Tootsie's, though there are a few tables inside. We ordered at the counter and all three of us got the pollone with the homemade chips. I also ordered the zeppole (fried dough with powdered sugar sprinkled on top) since so many people mentioned it in their reviews. The guy at the counter was very friendly and help us how to pronounce the names of the dishes correctly and with Italian flair. And since it was our first time there, he threw in the zeppoles for free. Awesome! We were able to grab a table outside and in no time our chicken sandwiches came out. First bite, delish. The chicken was warm, crunchy, and juicy and the fresh slaw and capers gave it the perfect kick. This is the kind of sandwich I know I will crave time and time again. The potato chips were light, airy and nicely seasoned and they all seemed to disappear from my plate. The zeppoles arrived and were fried balls of doughy heaven...so good! They weren't too sweet and we savored each bite. Great place for lunch! I can't wait to check out their brunch and try the espresso granita.
This place was good, but I was expecting more given the fabulous reviews. We had the zeppole which were ok, but don't think I would get them again.  They were served cold - I'm not sure if they are supposed to be cold, but I assumed they would be at least warm since they are deep fried.  We also got them almost instantly after we ordered, so maybe we got some old ones or something. Also had the chicken sandwich, and the rib sandwich.  Both were ok.  The chicken sandwich would be bland if it didn't have slaw on it.  The rib sandwich basically tasted like a pot roast. All in all a good meal, though not sure this is something I would crave in the future.  It was worth a try though.
Sandwiches are delicious. & good homemade potato chips. dark chocolate mocha is so rich
I came across Tootsie's on yelp and decided to try it out. I was very happy with my meal, and I would definitely go back if I'm in the Stanford area. As others have mentioned, it's a cute little cafe located at the Stanford Barn building. I've never even noticed this area, even though it's pretty close to Nordstrom and Andronico's. I tried the chicken sandwich (pollone), which was mmm good. The chicken was deep fried but not too oily and very tender, and topped with endive slaw. It came with homemade potato chips which were quite delicious. You can't beat homemade chips! The Tootsie's veal & pork burger was tasty as well, which came with shoestring fries. To complete the meal, we had to try the popovers (zeppone), which totally hit the spot. They're deep fried, sprinkled with sugar, and a little eggy inside. About 2-3 is the perfect number to pop in your mouth. All in all, great brunch/lunch spot with outdoor seating (about 10 tables) and limited indoor seating. We came around 1pm on a week day, and we didn't have to wait very long for our food. Excellent customer service as well!
It's a nice lunch spot with plenty of parking, which is a great change from University Ave. I ordered the pollone (fried chicken) sandwich, but I wasn't so impressed.  Maybe my expectations were too high after seeing so many people rave about it on yelp.  The zeppoles were excellent though! I ate outside and really enjoyed the pretty lavender surrounding the place. I would come back just to relax and get some coffee and zeppoles.
I wanted to love you.  Did I expect too much? Your alluring sunlit patio, loaded with tables, a smattering of umbrellas and rather comfortable chairs. Friendly, patient counter staff and fresh ingredients of good quality. Presented as the perfect (lunch) date, I might not be calling you later for a second or is it a third. For nine bucks, I expected more out of a sandwich. Tuna Panino - bread was better than average, warm & toasty delish but what was touted as "Yellowfin Tuna w/capers, arugula and egg" was a bland, hyped up tuna salad that could have been made with standard white albacore and mayo. Seriously. The capers didn't pop, the slices of hard boiled egg didn't add excitement. Even a little cracked black pepper could have helped. FYI - most of the food, besides 6 or so menu items (see chalkboard), is prepared ahead of time and when they run out, it's out. So if you show after the lunch rush, prepare to be disappointed (unless you want the asparagus salad or burger). I'm slightly surprised I came back after initial let down (of 75% of the menu sold-out) but I was willing to let it slide... just that once. and then the tuna happened. or didn't happen. I'll give it one more go. Show me whatcha got.
Lovely place for a classy little lunch before a day of shopping at Stanford! Just walking into this area, it is just so quaint and high class. If you come here I totally recommend sitting outside and enjoying the ambiance. The inside of Tootsies is tiny, its just a quaint little sandwich place with coffee service and also little desserts as well. The menu isn't huge but I found the meal to be really satisfying! I had the Tuna Panino with Salad. I'm really picky with my tuna sandwiches and it was a bit dry for me. But, there was a pleasant crisp from the radish inside that was a good touch. I loved the bread too it was perfectly toasted but still chewable. The salad was with a great (apple?) vinaigrette. The serving overall was pretty big and filled me up! The service was great! The cashier asked me if I had been here before and was really patient and friendly considering they were really busy at that time. Even though it's not exactly a sit down place to eat, it has that vibe of a really classy place. Overall, sit outside for the ambiance, great for a nice lunch!
Wonderful place for breakfast. The sausage and peppers with egg platter is yummy. Yes, they do get busy and service can get a little slow, but this is a must do for breakfast / brunch in the Stanford area. A little small inside so visit on a nice warm day to sit outside and relax.
Loved my visit to Tootsie's!  I remember thinking "this is why I moved back to California" as I sat under a shady umbrella, munching on delicious ricotta pancakes, with the sweet smell of lavender wafting by. The food is outstanding - the sandwiches / burger in particular are exceptionally well prepared.  Why hasn't anyone else though of pairing perfectly toasted focaccia bread with a juicy, meaty burger??  It's genius My only wish?  That they would open on Sundays too!
I would rate this easily 4+ stars for a cafe, however as a brunch/restaurant place, it falls a bit short. -4 stars for Atmosphere, love the brick walls, wood floors, has a lot of character, very unique for the Bay Area. Small room, 5-6 small round tables (built for 2) Perfect place with a book and coffee, quiet place to meet a friend or two. Outdoor seating (a dozen) available if weather permits. -4 stars: Hot Chocolate is REALLY good. Came in a small Danesi cup (Euro style), but the quality of chocolate made it very satisfying & rich. I would definitely try it again & their coffees next time. -2.5/3 for the Burger: Not a classic burger, very herby, tastes like rosemary & lamb. I was expecting better after reading the raves, but though it's original & "gourmet-style," it wasn't for me. I like a good classic burger with flavor and I felt this was somewhat lacking and needed a lot of ketchup-  not very juicy. Also, shoestring fries were okay, very crispy and thin, like eating potato chips, it was tasty, but I like heartier fries. I would definitely recommend this place as I think it really is unique and charming and I would give their other lunch items another shot. I would think twice about bringing a group of 4 or more during busy times if the weather is cold. Again, I will come back again by myself for a coffee and pastry or meet up with 1-2 friends here.
This place is overall over-priced and over-rated.  I guess they're trying to make up for the dearth of conveniently located good eats for hospital employees (if you work in or around the hospital and don't wanna drive somewhere for lunch, you basically have two choices: the hospital cafeteria and the children's hospital cafeteria). Case in point: I came here today for lunch because my blood glucose level was dangerously low (I'm a raging hypoglycemic).  And I was too lazy to walk to the hospital cafeteria.  And Tootsie's was much closer.  I saw that they had a "fried chicken breast sandwich on a toasted roll with slaw" - as in, "our attempt at Bakesale Betty's famed chicken sandwich."  So I thought, what the heck, I'll splurge and give it a shot . . . only to be totally offended by these egregious culinary crimes: 1) The chef chucked something frozen into the fryer.  Wait a minute - that's not supposed to be my fried chicken breast is it?!? 2) The slaw looked like it was at least 2 days old: brown, wilted, sad and dejected. 3) They charged me $8.50 for a faux frozen chicken sandwich wannabe.  If you're gonna match BSB in price, at least attempt to match her quality and freshness in ONE of the components. The end.
Nice quaint little cafe, I especially like the small town atmosphere, sitting outside with the barn as the backdrop, it is comforting. Now let's talk about the food. Pizza -pretty darn good, dough is chewy, lots of dried vegetables and sausage. Chicken sandwich- not bad, crispy on the outside, fairly moist inside. Zeppola- $.75 each, we had three of those, very tiny, tasted a lot like the Chinese sugar coated fried donut. they are way too tiny and cold for my taste. Latte- Nicely done, a comforting drink. Service- Self served, I tried to pour my own water, but the pitchers were empty, had to ask twice before anything was done. Also, I asked for a container for the leftover, but the busboy totally forgot about it. The counter person is very friendly though. There was a long line during lunchtime. Overall, I like it, I will be back and try the panini sandwiches next time, being dog friendly is also a big plus for us.  Oh, by the way, they don't open on the weekend during winter time.
Our first stop for breakfast after an all night drive from Seattle, Tootsies did the job.  We were all pretty ravenous after dropping a friend off in Sunnyvale.  Went here based on the reviews and it was way smaller than it looks like in the pictures. Also, bathroom is across the courtyard. As far as ambiance goes, the place was tiny inside which could have been cozy if they had the heat on. Unfortunately it was pretty chilly and the metal slat chairs were a little rickety. You order at the counter and if you pay with a card they don't give you a way to tip them, so bring a little cash because the service deserves it. The food is well priced.  We ordered a latte, Bombay chai, Frittata, Breakfast Panini, and nigella croissant and it came to $20. First, the most surprising revelation as a Seattleite was that the coffee was amazing.  It was seriously in my top five coffees of all time.  The drip is really good too. My frittata was tasty, good amount of cheese and the mushrooms tasted like they were freshly cooked.  I should have got the panini because it was amazing, omg the pancetta on the sandwich *drool*.  I liked the croissant but didn't love it.  The size was good for the price but order a little extra if you're really hungry. Overall, they need to switch out the tables and chairs for sturdier wood and invest in adequate heating system but the food and service earned it a solid 3 striving to be a 4.
Came here with the rents on a beautiful (warm!) winter day.  Got a table on their outside patio to soak up some warm rays and cuz we had our dog with us (lots of dogs there!) Menu is not very big- about 15 selections at most but the quality is great! Order food inside and they give you a number and bring you your food when ready.  Self service for water and coffee- knifes and forks. Being that it was a gorgeous Saturday afternoon, the place was super crowded and it was a bit of a competition for outdoor seats.  Close to Standford Shopping Center so had a nice walk there after.
So after seeing the high ratings here on Yelp, decide to give this place try. We came here on a beautiful Saturday morning. With its outdoor seating and umbrellas, it's as good as it get. THIS, people, is the reason we pay such high taxes to live here in California (BTW, how can the State still be broke when we pay like ~40% in taxes??!!) Anyhow, back to Tootsies. My gf ordered the much talked about burger, and I took the recommended poached egg and coffee at the register. - The coffee is pretty darn good. One of the better straight coffees I find in the bay area. - The burger is great. The meat is a mix of beef, pork, and veal. Which leaves the meat juicy and loose, but definitely different from a "normal" burger. The string fries that comes with it, is pretty awesome as well. - Poached egg. It was kinda "ok" for me. It came with celery and olives on it. I'm not a big fan of either, so it's really my bad. But even so, the flavor from the celery and olive really brought a different culinary taste to your normal poached egg. So give it a try if you're a fan. There were so much more there I wanted to try on the menu, but I can only eat so much this day. Just on it's burger and the outdoor seating alone, make this place well worth the visit. Will definitely come back try some of the other recommend items. Pick a nice day and come out with your favorite book or newspaper and enjoy a piece of the good life (which we paid out of our a.... for).
Off to the side of California Cafe at the Stanford Barn is a little tiny brick building with not much more than a counter, a kitchen, and a couple of seats inside.  For such an unassuming place, there is definitely a wow factor in the care that they take to prepare their sandwiches. I ordered the pollone (breaded chicken breast on a sfillatino bread roll, served with endive salad).  Definitely go for the salad instead of the "chips", because it's brilliantly "bitter" with a sharp sweetness to the vinaigrette.  The pollone itself is also excellent, with a generously sized piece of chicken.  It was actually too much chicken -- I like sandwiches that are simple and that don't overwhelm the best part, which is the bread.  But, it was moist, crispy, and bready nonetheless.  I also tried a bit of the portabello mushroom sandwich towards the end of my meal... and immediately regretted ordering the pollone!  There was a peppery-ness about it as you bit into the soft, velvety mushroom.  Absolutely fantastic! Just be sure to pick a table outside that's in the sun instead of the shade -- it can get blustery and cold on a windy day, but it certainly doesn't take away from the sandwiches and soups here.
Sorry, Treehouse. This is my new favorite place to eat in Stanford. I like the food here better than Cool Cafe in Cantor or Coupa Cafe in Y2E2. They make the best chicken sandwich I've ever had. If you like your chicken sandwich with ketchup and mustard, this isn't the sandwich for you. The focus of the sandwich is really on the flavor of the meat, and the thick, juicy, tender slab of breaded chicken breast easily holds its own in the taste compartment. I'm sure they brine them or something before hand, because there's no way it would be that moist otherwise. The endive-caper slaw balances the sandwich out, as do the herby homemade potato chips. Have a few zeppoli afterwards. They might be even better than the chicken sandwich. It's simple food, and even though I'm the type who get's the "everything" combination for everything from pho to salads, this simple works really, really well.
Came here on a Saturday morning with a group of friends. The inside of the place is very small and since the weather was cooperating and we had a large group, we decided to sit outside.  I tried the ricotta pancakes as well as the sausage, peppers, onion scramble, a bombolini (basically a donut with filling inside), and an order of their housemade fries.  Everything was really tasty, and portion sizes were decent.  Nice decor, cute atmosphere, I'll be back! Note: This place is a bit hidden and may not be easily spotted from the street.
Great easy chill outdoor lunch with a group of friends who's looking to just chill~~ The Pollone chicken sandwich was my favorite of all time, plus an excellent cup of Espresso! This place is hard to find.
Delizioso!  Everything about this place is good.  The staff is welcoming, friendly, funny, and patient.  The patio presents a very relaxing space to sit and enjoy your meal or sip a drink.  The brick cottage is the perfect home for a quiant little cafe. Arriving just after 1 PM, we missed the panini selection and had only the chalkboard menu to choose from, which was plenty.  We all selected the Tootsie's burger with fries.  The burger was a blend of veal, pork and beef mixed with herbs served on ciabatta bread making for a very flavorful, tasty, and juicy mix to satisfy our appetites.  I opted for the shoe-string fries cooked just the way I like 'em, crisp with coarse salt to compliment my burger. (One can go with a mixed green salad instead of fries.)  It's not a small burger, nor is the portion of fries small...I ate every crumb.  Delectable! I quenched my thirst with one of the Italian sparkling sodas, the blue one (I forgot the name), very pleasing and refreshing.  To complete our meal, we sampled a basket of zeppoles.  They were not fresh from the oven, but still moist and good.  I will certainly return to try them warm with a hot coffee beverage.  We enjoyed our lunch and the gorgeous sunshine on the patio.  A very pleasant afternoon. On the way out, I took a cafe shalvalotza (sp?) to go.  As described to me: It's the way Italian's drink espresso in the summer, double shot of espresso on ice shaken with sugar.  Yum! I could certainly make this a weekly destination.  The prices are reasonable and the food is GOOD!  We all agreed we'd return with friends.
5 stars for the food. I had the Italiano panini (spinach, sun dried tomatoes, ricotta, and pesto) and it was bomb. One of the best panini's I've had. Instead of chips I had a salad with my panini which was tasty - not drenched in dressing which was awesome. 1 star for the seating. It's TINY. There are maybe 6 tables all cramped together. I would say only go to this restaurant if you are willing to sit outside where there is more seating. So, I averaged the two and came up with 3 stars for this restaurant.
I love their bomboloni when I can find them and just everything about Rocco's place. I wish they were open in the evening as well.
Toostie's how I love thee... There's something about this place that just makes me really happy whenever I'm there. Maybe it's the red brick "cottage" that seems to transport me away from the bay area and into another world. Maybe it's knowing that my food and service is being run by individuals that used to employed by Mario Batali. Maybe it's because the food is just good. Maybe it's all of the above. Hands down my favorite outdoor eating location. You can't beat it. My wife and I frequent this place often and have ordered everything from the burger to the breakfast items. Worth visiting if you need a reminder that life is good.
Tootsies is simply the best. Small seating? Yes, space is at a premium in Palo Alto, especially on Campus. They provide lovely indoor and outdoor seating though. If you get there right at noon there's a slight wait, just like anywhere else. The amazing food MORE than makes it worth it! Rocco and Shannon have done a great job of offering fresh, delicious, authentic Italian food and awesome coffees. I eat here at least twice a week (coffee almost every day) and I've never had something that I didn't love.
Tootsie's is the type of place that Stanford has needed for a while. It's a small, charming Italian cafe and restaurant nestled on the backside of the Stanford Barn. It's a welcome newcomer amongst the mediocre mall restaurants, the hospital cafeterias, and of course, its overpriced and underwhelming neighbor, the California Cafe. Inside Tootsie's, it's cute, cozy and colorful with a handful of cafe tables. Outside, the large patio is the perfect place to hang on a warm, sunny day. Tootsie's has a much better patio space than California Cafe. If you are looking for quality coffee drinks and authentic Italian bistro food, this is the place to go in the Stanford area. They have only been open for about a week and a half now, but I have made 3 visits to Tootsie's. Yep, I'm already a big fan. Everything - yes, I mean everything - is delicious. They serve fresh pastries, hot breakfast items, soup, sandwiches and salads. My favorite morning treat has been the zeppole (fresh made Italian donut holes) and my favorite lunch item is the Tootsie's burger, made with veal and pork, caramelized onions and mozzarella - it's awesome. I've also tried the fried chicken sandwich which I dare to say is even better than the fried chicken sandwich at Bake Sale Betty's in Oakland. The sandwiches come with a salad or homemade potato chips - get the chips, they are completely addictive! The coffee drinks are fabulous - much better than the local chain coffee joints. You can tell that they put a lot of thought into the ingredients and products that they use - from the pastries, to the vegetables, to the bread (some bread is made in-house), to the coffee (straight from Italy). Service has been consistently friendly and prompt. Prices are reasonable (no, not cheap) with the most expensive item on the menu being $8.50 for the burger. Coffee drinks are slightly higher here than at local chains, but the quality more than makes up for paying a few cents more. You get what you pay for. Bottom line: delicious Italian bistro food, quality coffee, great service, welcoming ambiance, nice patio, good location, reasonable prices.
I really love this place. If you're looking for giant portions of carbs and sugar, this isn't the place for you.  If you're the kind of person who doesn't like to wait for a table, this isn't the place for you.  This isn't a diner. If you want some really well made and though-out Italian food, that is properly portioned and halfway healthy, this is a great place.  I had the sausage and eggs.  The eggs were properly cooked, the sausage was tasty, and everything else on the place was scrumptious, including the chunks of bacon sprinkled about the potatoes.
Pleasant Saturday morning outdoor breakfast! Sit outside and relax on a sunny day. The food is excellent and the coffee pairs perfect.  I will definitely return. This place is small and cozy.  You order at the counter and then select a indoor or outdoor table and they deliver the order when ready.  No matter what you order, you're sure to be happy.
I genuinely enjoyed this place.  The options are more rustic and such than the standard fare at the University.  The ambiance can't be beat. Sandwich was tasty, service was prompt.  Home made potato chips were a little soggy and they were out of a couple things, but other than that it would be 5 stars. Everything tasted fresh and the owner is a character.  A great place to take a lunch date if you just can't make it off campus.
Update: 01/2009: Came back since it's 2 min. from my office. I got the "I'm Green" which is portabello mushroom with veggie spread panini.  It was good, but totally skimpy on the mushroom.  The one slice of mushroom covered only 2/3 of the  bread, and it was much thinner than the two slices of foccacia, so I barely tasted it.  Still a bit greasy, but the flavors are good.  I would have liked more mushroom.  I'll still come back since it's SO close! _______________________ Since this place it right across the street from my office, I had to try it out.  It's either this place, or my default Andronico's Market.  It's a cute little Italian cafe, with a short menu of pastries, salads, paninis, and cafe drinks.  The atmosphere is great--really cute inside.  Very small, with only 2-3 tables, but plenty of outdoor patio seating. The menu seems interesting, though I'm not sure about the prices.  The drip coffee was $2!  Pastries were at least $2.50 each.  I ended up ordering a "tuna fritter" sandwich, with capers and mixed greens on a french bun.  It was not good.  For $8.50, it was even worse.  I had imagined "tuna" patty cakes, breaded and fried.  But what I tried to eat was some weird, potato-like patty, with a hint of tuna flavor.  The worst part is the consistency of the patty.  It was very mushy, but grainy, and a very bland taste.  To make it worse, it was very oily, enough to soak the bread, and drip into the take-out box.  Mixed greens were skimpy, and sadly, the best part of the sandwich was the caper-spread, and even that was too salty.  A side of freshly made, salted chips came with my to-go meal. I also wanted a small dessert, perhaps a cookie or tart.  All they had were shortbread cookies from Satura Cakes.  Though good, of course, it would have been nice to have a wider selection. Because it takes me less than a minute to walk here, I'll give this place another shot, but will definitely order something else.  Or I may just pass it up on my way to Andronico's--sandwiches for the same price, bigger, healthier, and definitely tastier.  And they have fresh-baked cookies. One star for location, one for atmosphere, and one for service. They did have a very friendly, and prompt staff.
Rarely do you find a lunch/brunch spot that has the perfect combination of good food, location, scenery and service. My grandmother and I ate lunch there on my birthday and were delighted at the inventive menu and outdoor seating.  We ordered from Shannon (holding Elliott :) and went and sat outside surrounded in the corner seat by roses and lavender. The food service was friendly and prompt.  The energy of the place is relaxed and creative-  all of the staff was friendly and engaging. Can't wait to go back!
Granted I was here for a wonderful occasion, celebrating a new baby with friends and they were quite the fun bunch and we had the place to ourselves for this event but those dynamics aside - I suspect I will be dreaming about this place for days to come. Been living in the Bay for 4 years now and this place really represents one of the best food and service experiences I have had. My meal: Arancini di Riso - was totally unexpected. Simple but amazing and decadent all one plate. I didn't read the description as well as I should have because the risotto was a ball stuffed with mozzarella and it was heavenly. The arugula salad paired with it was the perfect fresh and lite accompaniment to the richness of flavor from the risotto. I was totally transported but wait there was more... The bread and pastries, I could not possibly try them all but the ones that I did were highly addictive - I managed to escape by only trying about 2 but let me tell you if you're in to the tea/coffee, pastry for breakfast scene - this place is where you want to go. Finally the tiramisu - totally would not have ordered this but it was a set menu and who resists pre selected dessert? Well I didn't and thank God, it was so fresh, creamy and just soaked with the right amount of coffee and other flavors...dangerously good stuff! This is probably the 2nd or 3rd review I've written - this place was worth taking the time to do it. Last note - it is quite small so not sure what the experience would be like on a regular day but I will make it a point to go back and often!
I love this place.  I come here about once a week and I always have a great meal.  It is a tiny restaurant and gets a little crowded so it is best to go a little early if you go for lunch.  The menu isn't huge, but I appreciate that everything that I have tried there is done well.  I get my food to go a lot and I never have to wait more that 10 minutes.  The people that work at Tootsie's are also really nice. I typically get the tuna sandwich.  It comes on a baguette and has capers and red onions in the tuna salad.  It is light on the mayo and since I am not a huge mayo fan, this is one of my favorite things about the sandwich.  The bread is toasty and it comes with homemade chips or a salad.  It is one of my favorite tuna sandwiches I have ever had.  I put the homemade chips in the sandwich to add a little crunch. The coffee, iced tea and sweets are also really good. Overall, I highly recommend Tootsie's.  It is one of my favorite places in Palo Alto.
Love love love this place. Great atmosphere. This place is my new coupa cafe, which was starting to get way to yuppie and the staff there really started to hate the people buying $15-20 lunches everyday. Anyway, really interesting menu for a cafe!   A veal/pork burger that was amazing the three times I've had it, though I don't really want to eat any more infant calf.  The little sandwiches that are premade are also delicious, though a bit expensive.  Good deal if you're getting a side salad or fries with it though.  They have a changing weekend brunch/breakfast menu too! As for the actual espresso, its been very good.  Though my friend did have an awful iced latte from here, I think the milk was old or something, we didn't really notice until we had walked a distance, or at least he didn't start complaining until we walked away. One complaint, wish they had reusable cups for their iced drinks, I really hate seeing all that plastic go to waste when people are staying there to enjoy their beverage. Overall, the staff and owners are super friendly.    And the atmosphere just makes it.  Ivy covered old brick barn, palm trees and oaks, a field of lavender next to your umbrella'ed table. Tres Magnifique!
This place is hidden but it's near California Cafe on Welch Road.  The outdoor seating area (4 chairs to a table) was what did it for me while eating here.  Even though the outdoor tabling faces Welch Road, it's not especially noisy and it faces the pretty red brick/vine barn. Concept - Order food from the occasionally changing chalk menu in the front of the counter and then they bring you the food when it is ready. I came here for breakfast/brunch. I really wanted to order the scrumptious looking black currant scone ($2.75) on Yelp photos but I ended up ordering a pecorino and mushroom frittata ($4.75). I was kind of disappointed that they did not have any "English breakfast" tea bags. I ended up ordering green tea instead. The fritatta came with four wedges of thin toast along with peach jam. I'm glad the food wasn't overfilling to my stomach. It was light enough. I would like to try the octopus salad on the menu for lunch someday (~$10). Thanks J for finding this hidden gem!
"Quaint!"   -   One word sums the place up. Location is really nice, and you definately feel like you're in a combination of Stanford University (students or professors) and Sand Hill Rd professionals (or their wives).  Yeah, there were well dressed elderly patrons on a Saturday morning. Food wise, I had the pulled rib sandwich and salad.  It was a bit lacking in flavor, and bread was a tad soggy, dripping with more oil than I like.  I wish I got the burger instead. But nice place for an outdoor meal on a nice day.
Wasn't overly impressed with this place despite the numerous great reviews. If not for Yelp, I wouldn't have ever known about or found this place. When you get there, you stand in line to order. I would recommend having someone in your party hover over the tables (while you stand in line) outside so that you can grab the table as soon as it's vacant; otherwise, it may be awhile before you find an open table. My fiancee ordered the tuna panini ($8.75), while I had the tootsie's burger ($9.75) - beef, pork, and veal patty with mozzarella cheese on a rosemary bun. We felt the food was good, but not great, given the prices. There isn't much in terms of service, so be prepared to ask for more water and bus your own dishes. I may be back for a second opinion, but probably won't crave it in the meantime.
Cute Italian deli...I love their sandwiches.  My favorite is the sausage on foccacia.  This place is so worth it, it gets really busy during lunch but if you stop by early you'll be in an out in no time.  The place empties out around 1:00-1:30PM but the selections are pretty slim by then, which in my opinion is a good sign this place is popular and good. Tootsies also has breakfast items like chocolate croissants and donuts.  I didn't know they carry cream filled donuts...it was the best donut I ever had.  Stop by if you're in the area.
The good reviews here made me try Tootsie's for lunch yesterday. It looks like the entire Stanford Hospital empties out at lunch and heads there. Couldn't get a seat in the beautiful lavendar/rose garden, so had to sit inside which is pretty noisy and crowded. That said, we both had the Tootsie Burger with their homemade French Fries. Both dishes were very good. They make a European burger, i.e., using equal parts of ground beef, veal, and pork. This is mixed with herbs and served with sauteed onions. It is quite different from a US burger and is very good in its own right. Some people mentioned having ricotta pancakes for breakfast there, but I did not see it on any menu.
Drove 30 minutes each way to check out this place based on a recommendation from a friend and it was worth it. I had the ricotta pancakes and a latte.  The pancakes were light, fluffy and delicious.  The fruit added some flavor but they could use a bit more flavor to them.  The latte was perfect and the service was super friendly. I definitely recommend this place.
I love me some bombolonis and Tootsie's has them! That automatically makes them 5 stars for me.
If you can deal with the teeny tiny space and a potential battle over outdoor seating, this place is wonderful. The food is order-yourself authentic portions of panini, salads, and other creative specials.
The staff is very friendly- even when you ask irritating questions because you forgot your glasses and can't read the menu..... When I worked at Stanford it was great to sneak out of LPCH and across the street to Tootsie's. I was still close by, but I felt like I was taking a real break! It's very relaxing to sit at their tables outside while you drink your coffee.
If you don't like love songs, skip this review. Tootsie's is a real hidden treasure. The space is inviting and fresh, and so is the menu of original salads, panini, and light italian fare. The options are scanty, but everything is delicious. They use stellar ingredients in all of their sandwiches. I appreciate their pairing of fried items (chicken breasts, arancini) with bitter greens and savory condiments like capers, parmesan and dried oregano. High quality preserved fish is another feature of the menu. It's a style of food that's difficult to find in this country. The coffee is top notch and so are the pastries. Try the filled croissants and the bomboloni alla crema. Their bread is also amazing, and I can't wait to try their pizza and foccacia. For less than $10, you're in for a real treat!
Okay, I'm not witting a book like everybody else here... Jeez! What you need to know: This place is good. Food and drinks. Price is reasonable, ambiance is pleasant, service is okay, not great, not  bad.
Stopped in at Tootsie's today after early morning doctor appts.  I had the Ricotta Pancakes and a latte - delicious pancakes, hot steamy strong latte!!  My husband had the Tootsie's Burger - fabulous, tasty beef/pork patty, lots of cheese and flavorful fresh-baked bun and yummy shoe-string potatoes!! The place is very small inside but there's plenty of outdoor seating.  We sat outside in the sunshine and enjoyed our brunch.  The servers were quick and very pleasant. We'll definitely be back!  I want to try the little creme filled donuts and other sandwiches.
Another good place to have italian paninis or salads on a nice day, but finding parking during prime time around here is a PITA. I tried their burger, which was full of herbs and oregano. It was definitely tasty, but I wished I ordered the perfetto italian sausage panini instead. Their shoe string fries were nice and crispy.
My friend and I decided to meet up for lunch here since she works on the Stanford campus & I've always wanted to try Tootsie's.  Unfortunately they only have a few items available everyday.  I had visited their website and unfortunately my first two choices were not available that day & the burger sounded good until I saw some people on Yelp saying that the mix of the meat reminded them of lamb, which I don't eat!  I decided on the Italian Sausage Panini & she got the Portobello Panini.  Both came with a choice of chips or a salad & we just chose the salad to be healthier.  After tax our sammies were nearly $10, kind of pricey for a take out kind of place and for the portions.  The small side salad was just some greens.  The sandwich came with a broccoli pesto and red peppers.  It was nothing special really.  I think we liked her Portobello slightly more.  Even though the surrounding area (Stanford campus/Stanford Shopping Center) don't have that many $10 & under lunch options, I felt like I could have been more satisfied with sandwiches that I get from CPK ASAP & Neiman Marcus Cafe. I totally wanted to try breakfast but on weekdays they cut it off at 11.  I don't think we'd be coming back anytime soon.
Good sandwiches, nice setting outside (especially on a warm weekend). Ordered the Tuna Panino--yellow fin tuna with onions, celery, capers, eggs and a side of arugula salad. Healthy tasting and average price ($7-8).
I love the breakfast here, good grub Coffee was hot and strong.
Awesome food, awesome staff, awesome coffee. Also great atmosphere outside on the patio. I go everyday and the menu never ceases to amaze.  Bravissimo!
If you're ever looking for a casual and delicious place to grab lunch at Stanford, Tootsie's is the place to go. I recommend coming here early, like around 11:30am, to beat the long lunch lines. My friends and I have a tradition of coming to Tootsie's for lunch on Fridays, so we definitely love the food here. Tootsie's is great because their menu is diverse enough so that everyone in your group will find something that suits their tastes. They offers brunch, sandwiches, burgers (with house-made potato fries or shoe string fries) pizzas, soups and salads. I LOVE their salads. They are definitely very creative with them; some examples are their octopus/farro salad, smoked trout with zucchini fritter salad, heirloom tomato salad. So you usually can't go wrong. My friends rave about their paninis and burgers! I'm pescetarian, so normally its difficult to find a worthwhile sandwich or burger, however I'm definitely going to try one of their veggie paninis at some point. **all paninis are served on foccacia bread and they also have freshly made personal pizzas. Props, also, for offering lunch desserts such as MACAROONS, MERGINGUES (for someone who loves and has eaten many macaroons and meringues, the one's at Tootsie's are pretty good!), biscottis and fresh granola. I think they sometimes change their menu, by adding new selections, so it always takes delicious. Their portions are medium, but fill me up really quickly. Quality is fresh, flavorful and delicious.
After 4 years of college and another 6 or so years in the area I cannot believe I recently discovered this places. I found the fried chicken sando that everyone raves about to be so-so, but the homemade chips that came with were pretty fantastic. Such a cute, quaint little spot I would def come back and give these guys another shot - - just not the chicken sando.
Daughter and I had brunch here this morning. Loved it!  We shared the asparagus frittata that comes with a small green salad as well as the poached egg on toast with olive and celery tapenade. We requested they sub the sides to potato chips which were soo good and dangerously addictive and these yummy shoe string fries. We split a raspberry croissant afterwards. The food was absolutely wonderful, service was pleasant but a bit shaky. The prices were completely reasonable and worth every penny.  This  place has replaced our previous favorite brunch place (mayfield bakery cafe). Much better value here at Tootsies. Thanks Mercury News for alerting us to this very cool lil place!
The garden is charming. The attractive, attentive Italian owner helped us find seating when he saw most bistro tables were all occupied.  He even moved tables and chairs to accomodate us in the garden space, The delicious foccaccia  sandwich lunch was mouth watering and memorable. Everything here is delicious and fresh. Highly recommend!! I am going back very soon.
Authentic, Authentic, Authentic. Fabulous espresso, fresh pastries, enough crowd energy to enjoy but not overwhelm you.  The line was 8-9 people the last time I went to Tootsies, but I only waited about 6 or 7 minutes. I haven't tried anything but espresso and pastries, but those are fabulous.
Arriving well after the lunch rush, we encountered a sweaty kitchen crew who'd exhausted several menu items, but kindly pulled some of the beignet batter from the fridge and fried up half a dozen.  After a Palo Alto Creamery breakfast, I wasn't hungry at all, but had to try these plus a side of sausage to balance it out.  Hostage Gastronome Jr. ordered the tuna panino thinking it would be seared ahi instead of tuna fish - as it was pretty good, he wasn't crushed by disappointment (after the Stanford tour, maybe he was in the mindset of appreciating free food).  HG Sr. felt that his 3 meat Tootsie burger was healthier and leaner than an all beef patty, and enjoyed the flavors too.  The beignets weren't anything special unfortunately, but the solitary sausage was tasty - no rancidity, squirting oil, or blackened casing.  I asked for a glass of milk, but they shouldn't have sold it to me at a temperature not appropriate for drinking. I guess this place is nice for an on-campus eatery, but the whole affair reminded me of an episode of DDD where a guy cooks on hot plates. Now, the jewelry store in the actual barn where I tried on an $84,000 mine cut diamond bracelet rates 5 stars with me!
Great atmosphere. We had trouble finding the location, because there were a couple of buildings and restaurants around, so I went in one of the buildings and asked, "is this Tootsies?" and the guy replied, "yup! One and only!" Nothing like a good welcome from energetic staff. Like. Building and tables were nice too. Like. The food was pricier than I expected. Coffee and a burger cost me $12. The burger had a nice rosemary flavor to it, but a little too greasy. Maybe I'm getting too old for this stuff. My wife was having the pollone, and it was nice. Crispy on the outside, soft on the inside.
Tell you what, this place is one of the reasons why I love working in Palo Alto. This place has very unique blends sandwiches and salads all of which give that 'fresh organic' taste. I'm still trying out all the paninis, but my favorite so far is the tootsie burger with either a side of their thin-thin cut fries or chips. Seating is limited if you come during the busy hours, and you basically have to bus your water and plates, but it doesn't really bother me too much. This is definitely the kind of place that I would take a friend out to if they're not from this area.
Really good sandwiches here. I had the Salami Panini with the home made chips, and the Panini was really good, and the chips were OK (not the as good as I expected from what I read other reviewers had said).  Next time I need to try their burgers.
Had the spinochio salad  with Chicken for lunch.  It was  so fresh and bursting with flavor. The lavendar bed right next to seating area is enchanting ! You can enjoy the smell while having lunch :-)
I ordered a Tootsie burger and my wife ordered a Tuna pannini. Her Tuna pannini was ok but I find my Tootsie burger tasted a little funny. First of all , the meat was too dry. Second, Tootsie added some funny spice within  the pattie and tasted a little weird. I don't think I will go back again.
The food is amazing, the atmosphere is perfect and the service is stellar.  An easy 5 stars and a great find.  Thank you Yelpers!!!
I eat here at least one a week.  The staff is always friendly and the food is great. Especially the homemade chips. I would highly recommend this restaurant to everyone.
Everything here is delish!! Fresh bread and healthy choices of salad. I had the Oven roasted Portobello sandwich served with sauteed radicchio on balsamic vinegar and goat cheese on housemade foccacia. The foccacia was soft and  Portobello with goat cheese just melts in your mouth. YUUUUUUMMM. My friend had Pollone, Crispy fried chicken breast on a toasted roll, topped with endive slaw.  And it looked good too. This little place had a beautiful out door rose garden but it was soooooooooo hot today that I ate in doors. Great place to have lunch and chat with your friends. Food isn't over priced and quality of all the food and bread was amazing!
This place is located in-between the Stanford Shopping Center and Stanford Hospital. The food is very good and the price is reasonable given its quality. The service is generally quick and friendly. There is also a lot of outdoor seating available, which is a nice perk on a warm, sunny day. It's an easy place to recommend if you live or work near Stanford.
Really lovely atmosphere and yummy food. Why have I not heard of this place before? Came here for brunch with a few friends and I had the ricotta pancakes - can't remember last time I enjoyed pancakes that much. We sat outside with the scent of lavender... wonderful for a relaxed weekend morning. Bonus points for the server actually being Italian and a big group of Italian customers!
Cool place to chill with ur love on the outside patio. Good solid Italian sammies n salads. It's owned n operated by a hip friendly Italian guy. The lavender field is a thing of beauty.
After reading the review of Tootsie's in the SJMercury I went to yelp and saw the positive reviews so Saturday my wife and I had lunch there. I ordered iced coffee and the Uova Romano and my wife ordered the melanzane (eggplant) sandwich.  The Uova Romano was a sandwich with a poached egg, a slice of pancetta and spinach on a soft roll.  As a lover of poached eggs all I can say is that this may have been the best sandwich of my life.  Along with that sandwich came some grilled potatoes that were also delicioso.  The melanzane sandwich was also very tasty.  The iced coffee was an excellent addition to the meal. We sat outside on a lovely day and and service was excellent.  I can't wait to return. If this review sounds like it was written by the owner's son, it wasn't.  I am just a very happy camper.
Thanks to yelp I have found this hidden place where is surrounded by a beautiful lavender garden. I went there on Saturday for brunch, and it was really full. Fortunately, I was able to find a seat. The cappuccino and the dish I had was great Even tough it took them a little bit longer to prepare my food, I still enjoy having brunch there. I had a good time, and I will return there for more. 73/100
i went there late!!! so didn't try the pancake and omelet! sad!! but i had a fairly nice tuna sandwich!!!!!
What a cute little place.  When you walk in you see the open kitchen and the bread/pastries neatly displayed along the countertops.  The menu options are very lively (ricotta pancake, 3 meat burger, toast w/ nutella, potato w/ bacon bits).  I happen to go when it was rainy so the inside seating was very limited (under 15 seats) with tables so small, they almost resembled stools.  It was very tight and cozy.   I ordered a mushroom frittata but got a mushroom omelet.  The potatoes w/ hard bacon bits were delish.  If you are claustrophobic or have no patience, this isnt the place for you unless if you go on a sunny day.
This captivating little cafe sits quietly with an unassuming demeanor and decked in classy red bricks embracing the gentle strokes of wind combing through its fabrics. The exterior looked as if this little shack had been magically brought to life from my early childhood storybooks. Although the proximity may have the campus nearby, a gentle glimpse at this fairytale will have you at instantaneous ease with a soothing sense of detachment on top of an outpouring reverence for simple elegance. Too bad the weather deterred us from sitting in their gorgeous patio, but inside was more comforting as the red brick walls and a crowd of petite round tables reminded me of those good ol' days in Boston. Just when I was questioning if this place was too perfect and surreal, a playful sign stood firm in their dining area that reads, "There will be a $5 charge for whining". With that stroke of light hearted paternalism I was quickly brought back to earth. Fellow Yelper Bradley N and his wife Camelia were very gracious to bring me here for a round of afternoon coffee. This is one of Bradley's favorite spots in town so it was a real treat to experience it for myself. With a self serve layout, they invited me to share an order of Insalata di Tonno ($8) and I also had a double espresso ($2.25). The salad came with super fresh arugula with tuna, cannellini beans, shaved fennels and a drip of lemon dressing with two decorative focaccia on the side. The salad was delicious with the lemon dressing perfectly complemented my bites of tuna and the bittersweet arugula. The cannellini beans added good texture, and my Danesi espresso was dark, rich, and brought a heavier taste to give our light snack for a pleasant contrast. Although service was brief, our server was friendly and gave all of us free amaretto cookies as we were settling our bill. Despite this wonderful experience, I have yet to experience their true greatness as they were without their freshly made nutella croissants and homemade scones by this time of the day. 4 stars for this introductory visit. I will be back because their menu is telling me that there is so much more to like about this place than my inner most imaginations.
This place is a really tight squeeze especially on a rainy day when all of the outdoor seating is unavailable. However, when an establishment uses 60% of whatever restaurant space it has for the kitchen, and the chef spends an inordinate amount of time teaching the staff how he wants his croutons to float on the heavenly vegetable soup of the day, the inconvenience is probably worth it.
The husband and wife team here are awesome. It's the type of social interaction you want when you go out to eat. I got a frittata and a San Pellegrino Chinotto. Upon seeing this the wife was like, "are you sure you want that?" I say yes, and the husband comes out and says "Eveyone who orders that, hates it. I generally buy that to drink myself. So we get into this conversation about bitter beverages, how I like my coffee black and they then turn me on to an Italian beverage called Amaro. Apparently it's all over Italy but pretty rare in the US. They recommended me a few brands, and strangely enough that very night, I ended up at an Italian place that carried a bunch of Amaro. Thanks to the gang at Tootsie's for an awesome meal, an education on Italian beverages, and just an overall great friendly conversation.
4.5 stars? Really people? REALLY? We were largely disappointed with this place. The interior in extremely cramped, there's barely enough standing room to form the line at the register. The majority of the tables are outside which makes this place a great choice for a sunny day, the problem, not enough tables, so be prepared to play the "watch and wait" game. Finally, the icing on the cake, like so many people have pointed out, the food here is REALLY bland. It looks appetizing enough but with each bite you get a whole lot of NOTHING. Where's the flavor? Where's the taste bud explosion? There were absolutely no "OMG" moments. Oddly enough the menu is very small and limited so you'd think that all offerings might be exceptional....but no. FAIL. Needless to say, I won't be rushing back to this place and I'm unlikely to recommend it to others. Better luck next time Toots!
Still loving Tootsie's after who knows how many years.  I'm here for breakfast or lunch about once a week and just can't get tired of it.  I'm drooling just thinking about it.  I guess I know where I'll be going for breakfast tomorrow.
I love Tootsie's, it's a great spot for lunch and just a charming little cafe.  The owners and staff... Read more 
pretty good for the people working in the area.  feels like a charming hidden escape, perfect for sunny days.  sit outside under the umbrellas.  had the burger with the pork and veal patty (not tasting like a traditional burger though), good with the caramelized onion, mozarella, lettuce, mayo.  fresh shoestring fries this is my fav restaurant around stanford the pollone chicken was freshly fried and the slaw great their panini pressed and oiled superbly with right out of the oil potato chips.  on a sunny can't go wrong here -- have to wait a little at lunch since your meal is freshly prepared tried the frisee smoked salmon creme fraiche omelette -- another dish that works when all the elements are combined
Beautiful and relaxing outdoor surrounding - food was light, with high quality ingredients, tasty, fresh and memorable. My family and I came here for lunch during a weekday, along with my toddler and we had such a wonderful experience.  Altogether we ordered the Burger, Lo Spinachio salad, the tomato basil pizza, and the zeppoles. The burger was SO tasty, juicy, simply full of flavor.  And the homemade burger bun was nicely baked with herbs as well, which enhanced the meal even more.  The accompanying homemade fries were simply addictive. Lo Spinachio salad was tasty wonderfully refreshing with the nice warm weather on that day.  It came with  two slices of foccacia bread on the side. My toddler enjoyed his tomato basil pizza.  Although the cheese was really light as a topping, still he wolfed down his "homemade bread" sprinkled with the little garnish. To end our lunch, we enjoyed the zeppoles - the little beignets sprinkled with sugar.  They were actually richer and more filling than I had expected.  They tasted like little cream puffs, without the cream inside, but filled with a moist dough. The place gets crowded really fast during lunch hour and the order line can get pretty long.  But, if you make it an early lunch (11:45-12:15 PM), you probably won't have to wrestle the crowd and can easily find an outdoor table to enjoy your meal.  Still, it's worth the wait.  A place I'll most likely come back.
I come to this place less frequently than I should, cause the place is nice and the personnel, especially the italian dude, is awesome.
Go for the ambiance, the flavor, and the freshness... During our visit, everyone ordered something different off the menu and it was all good.  The ricotta pancakes, the trout on fritter, the paninis, it was all lovely and delicious.  And the little donuts...Zepolas?..are soo good!  They're like fried profiteroles rolled in sugar.  I have to believe everything else on the menu is just as good, if not better.
This place was packed with doctors during lunch since it's so close to the Stanford hospital. Seating is sort of at a premium here, so if you find an open table grab it before someone else does! There are some tables indoors where you also order your food, but  the best seats are outside when the weather's nice! Tried both the chicken cutlet sandwich (pollone?) and this sausage peppers sandwich on focaccia, both were very good. Also tried some zeppole which are basically like tiny fried donut holes covered in sugar. How could those be bad? After a moment sitting in the sun they were also nice and toasty to eat. The iced coffee (forget the name) is very good as well - not very sweet so beware if you're used to having your coffee drinks super sweetened.
My most favorite starting in order - Toostie's burger, pollone and tuna panino. The burger is juicy and the pollone is nice and crispy. The food is fresh and made to order, so it can take a while. It can get busy during lunch hour on warm sunny days.
I was there on Saturday afternoon for lunch and had a divine meal. The restaurant is a cute brick building, and we soaked up the sun while at the outdoor seating, surrounded by lavender bushes! The staff are down to earth and friendly. =) Not only was the setting perfect, the sandwiches were Dee-li-cious! I had the vegetarian sandwich. The bread was toasted perfectly, crispy outside and warm soft inside. Grilled eggplant and red peppers were cooked just right, and went well with the fresh cheese and pesto. After the sandwiches, the waitress asked, "Would you like homemade tiramisu?" and of course I couldn't resist! The ladyfingers were nicely soaked with coffee/rum flavours, and layered with fluffy, lightly sweetened, mascarpone cheese. I can't wait to go back!
I have mixed feelings about giving a 1-star rating to a place that has been consistently getting 4 stars and 5 stars reviews, but as my experience concerns the hygienic handling of food, here goes: We went there for a group birthday lunch today and I ordered half a dozen of mixed macarons - lemon, key lime, raspberri and chocolate. They were so good I went back to buy a few more to take home. The cashier, who might be one of the owners (she had a toddler strapped in front of her as she took orders and ran the kitchen), got out a box of macarons and picked the individual macarons out of the box with her bare fingers. Since she's the only one taking orders and handling the cash transactions at the time, I was kind of grossed out b/c I wasn't sure if  she washed her hands after handling cash from the customer in front of me. Even if she had washed her hands, I would still expect any food service employee to use tongs or at least tissue papers to handle food, especially that she had a toddler strapped in front her her and was fussing with his hair and hands all the time! So while the macarons were delicious, I'm pretty sure we won't be returning again...
Food is soooo good, but a little pricey.
Though it's pricey, it's the one bright spot of having to visit the Stanford hospital next door. I wouldn't order the burger again, but the sandwiches are good stuff.
I recently returned from Bologna.  Now, I better understand this place.  The emphasis on ingredients makes this place exceptional.  The portion size is identical to Italy as are the prices.  This is definitely a slow food kind of place.  My only regret is that they don't serve dinner.  I need my piadina with prosciutto di modena.
This is my most frequent lunch place.  I should cath myself after eating the burger here but o so... Read more 
Doesn't get any better than this for a nice breakfast & coffee.  Really friendly service, great poached eggs, and good cappuccino.  Besides, who can complain about sitting on a patio surrounded by lavender and roses?
Tootsie's is located in a historic barn right next to the Stanford Shopping Mall and Adronico's Market.  The barn itself is gorgeous and is a museum, you walk through and Tootsie's is in the tiny barn behind the big one.  We both got the burger (9.50) with fries and it was amazing.  The burger itself was very juicy and flavorful, and the fries were rustic (skin on the potatoes) and shoestring cut.  Their coffee is very good too!  The best part is that if you sit outside, their are fields of lavender all around. :)
Great location, decent prices, and pregnant women everywhere.  I saw 4 of them, including the owner, in a matter of 30 minutes!  I ordered the breaded chicken sandwich and it was wonderful: flavorful and hot.  The endive slaw on the bottom of it gave it an extra depth to what would have been a normal chicken sandwich.  Also, they stop serving breakfast at 11am and be sure to come early because the parking can be limited and a line starts to form in sunny weather.
I've meaning to come here after seeing the reviews on Yelp.  Finally made it last Friday for breakfast.  It's a cute little place - very reminiscent of European cafes.  I had the panino - yum!  Egg was cooked just right... also had a hazelnut croissant which was oh so yummy and flaky.  They have a  great place to just chill out and sit outside.  It's not that big so I can see how it can get crowded with the lunch crowd.  I'll be back to try their cappuccino and other goodies.
I met my Italian friend at Tootsie's for breakfast this morning and it transported me back to Italy for a dreamy while...  Rocco was a wonderful host, made the perfect cappuccino and surprised us with a basket of zeppole on the house after we had already enjoyed our breakfast of a delicious flat bread with homemade apricot jam from his 120 year old tree (seriously!).  I'll definitely be making any excuse to meet friends for breakfast or lunch there anytime ;)
LOVE their coffee!  The fries are also killer.  But the best thing would have to be their zeppoles when they are hot (get them in the mornings). Oh my! How did I not find out about this place any earlier!  The outdoor seating is also gorgeous with a field of lavender enveloping the little cafe.  Perfect spot to sit and relax and enjoy great food with friends.
A cute little place to go to for a no nonsense brunch.  We had the fried chicken sandwich and the yellow tail sandwich.  Both were pretty good, although the yellow tail sandwich is more along the lines of a tuna fish sandwich.  The sandwiches are pretty big so I'd suggest just getting one and splitting it between two people and trying some of the other dishes We'll head back sometime in the future to try other things on the menu.
had the soup of the day and a sandwich here. it's a quaint lil cafe across nordstrom and stanford shopping center. for a tiny little spot, they have a great selection of freshly made sandwiches and salads and some breakfast items. i can't wait to come back and try more of their food but i'm a bit reluctant at the same time because this place is miniature.... there are about 5-6 small round tables that seat only two people and have just amount of table real estate to set down two drinks and two plates. so, just a warning, if you come to grub during a busy hour, you might have to sit outside. during the summer that might not pose a problem, but now that it's december, it might not be so pleasant.
Nice place for casual lunch.
Who needs 5 STARS when you can have the moon?  This is as good as it gets without going overboard.  Rocco has figured it out and this is my go to for lunch on the run or with a friend.  How come it took me watching Eye on the Bay to find out  about this place?  Have been here at least 2-3 times a weeks and I never tire of it.  Keep it up.  You have a good thing going!
Fresh and delicious salads with an amazingly quaint outdoor patio...it was so cozy, we sat outside talking, enjoying the warm sunny Winter day for a long while. I felt like I was in Europe on a corner cafe in Cinque Terre, Italy. I'm going back and next time, I'll try a panino for lunch.
I came here for coffee. I got a latte and it was great! Highly recommend this place.
At the suggestion of a friend, we decided to go here for some breakfast. Deliciousss. I had ricotta pancakes and the husband had some kind of wonderful pastry and coffee. The guys inside are so nice and relaxed. In a town full of stressed out, busy people, it's nice to go a place where the people who work there make your day a pleasant one! Nice place to bring a friend or family. Both indoor and outdoor seating, but I'd definitely suggest sitting outdoors as there are also umbrellas you can sit under it you choose you don't want to be in direct sunlight!
Cute place!  We just missed the lunch rush so we got our food in a reasonable time.  We were able to sit outside with our pooch and enjoy a lazy Sunday morning.  So crazy how we drove by this place so many times and never knew of it!
Pretty consistently good food.  Today, my pollone was a little off, but still okay.  It's a cute place, though not alot of indoor seating.  You can sit outside when the weather is nice.  The staff are always friendly.
Love tootsie's! The staff is super nice and they've always made a really big effort to get me my to-go orders as quickly as possible. I've had the chicken sandwich and the spinach salad, both were great. I recommend this restaurant for a nice lunch near campus.
Tootises is AWESOME! I had the eggplant sandwich on homemade foccacia bread and was VERY impressed. I also had the homemade potato chips which were dangerously good. The atmosphere is great and so is the service, and for the quality of food they offer, pricing is very reasonable. I plan on going back to Tootsies soon for the banana pancakes! If you have any doubt about trying this place, you don't have to worry. With a REAL Italian head chef preparing just about everything, you will not regret eating here!
Hidden gem at Stanford - Authentic and charming Italian cafe. Friendly service, excellent coffee  and food. Must try the Zeppole. Bravo!
Love this place! Most delicious cappuccinos in Palo Alto/Menlo Park area.
Hello! How adorable it this place!??!!! The location is great...you get to enjoy some great food while staring at a gorgeous lavender field! Loved the ambience and the feeling of something authentic and cozy al fresco. Boy, does Palo Alto need more of these places. I will definitely come back as they have great lunch items and breakfast options to try. If you want a new breakfast spot, check out the awesome pancakes. Totally fresh and delicious! The only thing this place needs is some cool, chill music to round of f the ambience of a cool cafe! Outdoor speakers would be great! I will definitely come back for more.
The tootsie burger was delicious (~$10). Staff was nice and I enjoy the outside patio where we usually sit to have lunch.
Authentic, simple and fresh Italian food. Quick and courteous service and a beautiful location with a large patio. Def recommed!  Shakerato is so good!
We visited on a cold winter day and sat indoors where the exposed brick and wood interior provides a great atmosphere.  I'd imagine on a sunny, warm day, when you can sit outdoors, this place is even more spectacular. The food is great.  Clearly put together by someone who cares about taste and presentation.
So this place gets another star. I swear on their delicious hamburger I was told to take a seat and I would be waited on the first time I went there. I SWEAR. Anyway, stampeding horses couldn't keep me away at this point. Such great food, friendly staff. Their mushroom and onion soup was killer. Everything is amazing. Perfect lunch spot, great prices. They do close before 5 sometimes, but everyone wants to get off early sometimes right?
This place has a great location, charming atmosphere and excellent food. It also has the absolute... Read more 
The place for a relaxed and pleasant lunch. Very cute cafe nested in lavender and flower garden. We tried: Panino sanwich - This was good and well-balanced. Crusty bread with pancetta and salad. Poached Eggs - Two well-poached eggs with runny yolks. I'm not a big fan of bread and the celery/olive salad that came with it. Bread was quite tough and salad was a bit greasy. Potato chips with herbs - Good munchies. The appearance was perfect but the chips were a bit cold and chewy. Parsley flakes were set at the bottom of the bowl. Decently-salted. Popovers - I thought they were bonbolini until I read other reivews. Bought for to go and gave to boyfriend to finish. Will ask him how they tasted. Tiramisu - Saved for later and was definitely worth it. Very yummy. Mascopone was light and fluffy. Sponge cake part was moist with flavorful coffee syrup. Good Good Good. Coffee - I had a cuppuccino which was good. Definitely Italian-styled with perfect aroma and full-bodied taste. I had gone back just for the coffee, unfortunate they were not open on Sundays.
Oh my god -- such a quaint little place on Welch road, right next to Stanford. Never imagined I would visit it in the midst of my doctor's appointment. It did not disappoint me a bit -- it actually cheered me up after sitting in the patients' waiting room for an hour. I ordered an Italiano sandwich that came with a nice salad on the side. The sandwich was toasted and was so flavorful! I think they serve the best sandwiches in the bay area. Their outside patio is so cute -- I felt like I was having lunch in a small village cafe in Europe or France. Would go there again and again!!! Try it once and you will be addicted, in a nice way.
Fantastic Yelp find! The husband and I were looking for a place to eat breakfast and yelped away. Found Tootsie's and jumped on over. I was half asleep- clearly- and the fantastic italian behind the counter knew a double shot cappuccino was what I needed. The breakfast sandwich was heaven and the cappuccino was the cloud I floated on to get there. Breakfast was so yummy that we went back for lunch! I had a spinach salad that was light and refreshing, my husband had the burger which he taunted me with because it was sooo good. If you are in and around the Stanford area you really should check it out. Not sure why people found it hard to find, it is right next to a large barn.. hence the name?? a large barn covered in ivy... at least for me it was hard to miss...
minus 1 star b/c inconsistent on pollone sandwich and there are no restrooms? at least not that I could see... I had the pollone twice. the 2nd time, the chicken was weird - like really had to chew it. but the outside crunchy part was good. the first time, it was great! it's like a little italy in Stanford Barn!! would go here over CA cafe anyday. though sometimes you gotta stress out about trying to get a seat... b/c it is so crowded. even at 1pm (after the usual lunch rush) got the nutella croissant but turns out, just a croissant, cut in half with nutella on it. I thought it was going to be like a choc croissant with nutella IN and baked in the croissant. alas no. my friend had the tomato salad and that looked DIVINE and she said with was divine.  alas, when I went back today, they didn't have it b/c tomatoes are not in season anymore. wah!
Great product and environment.  Had no idea what to get and picked something randomly and it was great (Italiano).
I'm confused about all of the amazing reviews.  I've been twice now and think it's hard to find seating, the food isn't that filling (well...I'm a vegetarian so the limited menu options that I've chosen haven't been filling,) and the food isn't anything that special.
Not bad.  Wasn't blown away but would go back.
Friendly staff, lovely outdoor seating, great sandwiches and espresso drinks (i'm also a sucker for foam art). I've been here for a quick bite during the week - a gem near the children's hospital. Liked it so much I dragged my hubbie here for breakfast on Saturday. We got there a little after 10am when they open and almost all the outdoor tables were taken... didn't realize it was such a popular place.
Frantic for a newcomer.  Once I got nestled in the food was incredible and found it to be charming in it's own way.
Cute and Quirky, tastefully executed and delivered.
Simply the best spot to grab lunch in Palo Alto.  Great service.  Superb food.  Beautiful atmosphere on sunny days for a non-pretentious lunch.
I could eat here everyday!  The salads are light and refreshing on a hot day.  And, the Italian sandwiches are fresh and delicious on a day when you want to enjoy great comfort food.  If you are a true coffee lover, don't leave without indulging!!!  The food is very rustic Italian, not overly saturated with salt and dressing, just very fresh and crisp. I hardly ever review restaurants, but when it is deserved...I can't pass it up!
I recently found out about this place.  I come here mostly for the coffee; the best in town. The cappuccino and macchiato are like those you get in little coffee bars everywhere in Italy. And, you have a nice little breakfast/light menu too. Great place!
Nice place to sit and enjoy some simple food. Away from the main mall but convenient enough. Not a pretentious place and a great place to catch up with a girlfriend over coffee and simple snack.
Delicious pastries and coffee. I tried the crescent and cinnamon roll.
Showed up at 9am for breakfast on a Saturday when passing thru Palo Alto. Had to go to Joanies instead. WTF Kind of breakfast place doesn't open until 10am???
Tootsie's is great.  Granted, I may be a bit biased, but I really don't think you will find a more delicious laid back brunch or lunch spot around - and certainly not near the Stanford Shopping Mall. The weekend brunch menu is delicious.  Somewhat limited in choice, but everything they offer (and I have tried about everything) is fantastic in flavor.  Very different combinations of flavors put together in a way that doesn't make you feel like you'll have a heart attack any time soon. Lunch offerings during the week are a lot more diverse, maybe because of all the offices around.  Sandwiches are phenomenal!
Definitely give them a try. They can get busy but I try and sneak in early and try something new every time. I have found that if it's not what I expected they are totally willing to help me out. Lots of fun! Some stuff I've never heard of before.
Cozy and comfortable, good choice for sunny day weekend breakfast or branch. Food are fresh. Vegitable is locally grown organic, I mean it is not factory prepacked one. Simple, right amount, not greasy.... I really love their way of cooking.
No pretense, just straight forward service, simple and high quality food, and comfortable relaxing environment to dine. If they add evening service, beer and wine, then I'll have to look into their offering a meal plan.
There's a lot to like about this place. One of the guys who works there (who I'd guess would be an owner) seems to be from Italy, and carries himself in a manner that evokes European service--a kind of refreshing politeness and warmness that makes one want to return. He literally yelled "yippie" once upon taking my order. As a vegetarian, there aren't a ton of options. I get the Italiano every time, with the home made chips, and it's excellent. The coffee is also delicious. Overall the place is great, but a bit pricy. If they could bring the prices down a bit, I'd eat here more often.
order your food at the bar, grab a drink from the fridge, and then go find a seat outside.  the portions here are really good, and they have yummy bread.  i had the poached eggs over toast w/ celery and olives today.  it came w/ a side of the home fries w/ pancetta, and it was delicious.  the eggs were super gooey when poked and ran all over the buttery toast.  yummy!  my friend got the breakfast panino, which was gigantic and came w/ a side of the home fries AND salad.  the panino had pancetta, spinach, and TWO over easy eggs.  i am getting that next time!
I joined Yelp for the sole purpose of writing a review of Tootsie's. In a country that has gone almost entirely to crap, where the majority of people are satisfied eating large quantities of bad food (as long as its cheap), it is such a joy to encounter a place like Tootsie's.  What incredible fortune this cafe opened up literally 50 feet from where I work at Stanford! This is the sort of place people should drive 50 miles to eat at, and I can just stroll across the street! Tootsie's is a bit emcumbered by its name, which may or may not have something to do with Leland Stanford's dog (or something like that). But the name certainly belies the fact that this is an absolutely stellar, authentic, first-class Italian cafe. Chef Rocco, who I think has roots in both Southern and Northern Italy, is an absolute genius at his craft. He uses the highest quality incredients to create classic Italian cafe fare: pizzas, panzanella, tigelles, paninos, fried pallone, etc. Each day there are fresh specials, typically a unique pizza, bruschetta, soup, paninos, etc. Essentially everything hits the mark. To sit out on the patio on a warm sunny day eating one of his coppa paninos surrounded by umbrellas and a small field of lavender is truly a thing of beauty.  I have travelled fairly widely in Italy, and have eaten some very good food; i think Tootsie's could compete with anything you would encounter from Venice to Capri.  Change the name and location, and people would pay 3x the price for food such as this. The food is made with both love and pride. Why can't we have more places like this? Buon Appetito!
such a cute little and hidden spot, yummy paninis, fresh pastries, good zeppole, homemade chips!!!! yum!!!, mocha! yum! very small inside, but has tons of outdoor seating for sunny days, people that work at tootsies are cool, smiley, and seem to enjoy their work...i need to try their burger!
Amazing lunch spot!They have fantastic espresso drinks! Everything is fresh and made there. The staff are all very friendly! Great spot to meet a friend for lunch or breakfast. The portions are good and jam packed with flavor! One of my favorite spots!!!
I usually go to California Cafe for lunch but this time I had my mother and aunt with me and we needed something fast and quick and not so sit-down.  We walked in and there were three other people in line.  We waited for about 10 minutes to order, when we finally had to place our order they literally had ran out of everything we tried to order.  Finally we got a chicken salad, a very small pizza (precooked, they just heat it up) and a side of fries for a total of $28!  I thought kind of overpiced and asked the guy taking the order to check the order, and he WAS so RUDE.  The guy we spoke to had an Italian accent, assuming he was the owner, he replied, what you think you can eat for free?  I let it go and went outside to find a seat and started our very long wait.  We came here because we couldn't stay too late and wanted something fast.  It took them over 40 minutes to get our order, 40 minutes for lettuce, precooked pizza and a small side of fries, REALLY????  Not sure if they were having a bad day cause three other people were standing by the counter complaining.  I asked for our food to go and ate it in our car as we made our way to our next destination.  When I told the guy who took our order about the long wait and I had expected it to be fast as it was after all a cafe, he literally laughed at me!!!  Who treats their customer like that?  With no apology?  The food was horrible, again, I'm not sure if they were having a bad day.  I will never go there again for lunch, maybe next time just a coffee and pastry.  Cute place, but horrible service.  Wish I could give this place negative stars.
It's true that this is a very pretty place for sitting outside -- but my frittata was not very good, my "toast" was just barely, the potato hash was undercooked, and the double latte was small and disappointing for the $4.25 price. I certainly wouldn't go here again for the food or the coffee. The pastries did look good, though.
Great food following the seasons! Nice to seat outside to have a nice healthy lunch. Very friendly people. The best granita around.
i had the tuna sandwich.  the menu makes it sound like a tuna steak, but it's actually just a normal tuna salad sandwich.  minimal seating for groups, went with a group of 10 and we had to find some random benches outside.  everybody liked the shoestring fries.
An excellent, authentic, bustling Italian bistro. The best this side of North Beach. The octopus salad is tangy and sublime, the grilled panini hot, flavorful and moist (not the dried-out slabs you get at the deli) and Rocco, the owner, runs the kitchen with a friendly flair. Best of all, Tootsies is a great place to people watch: Atherton dames, cardigan-clad academics, power shoppers and plain folk who come just for the pancetta.
Food is delicious. Owner is proud of his establishment and takes pains to deliver utmost quality  in food and service. Wonderful ambiance with outdoor seating. I only wish it were open for more hours in the day! Simply outstanding.
wow... I can't believe we had such awesome food this morning. We will definitely visit this cafe again next week.
Amazing lattes and frittata's, as well as a charming staff.  Great place for brunch! -especially if you are on the Stanford campus
I have been a regular here since its opening.  Mornings would not be the same without a triple cappuccino from tootsies. The coffee is strong but not bitter and the food is simply gourmet. The bread is baked fresh every morning and their foccacia bread is to die for. My favorite is the homemade lasagna only available every so often. The staff are charming and friendly and will always greet you with a smile. A welcome addition to the Stanford Community and well deserving of a all-around five star review.
The food is great, what else can I say.  These guys were featured on "Eye on the Bay" and the owner/head chef, Rocco, sounded very genuine in his love for the restaurant as well as the food.  The ambiance of the place is great.  You can come here with the family, or with a few of your girlfriends for lunch.
After another Doctor appointment at Stanford with my handsome man to chauffeur me around, we stopped at Tootsie's on my suggestion that we try the Chicken Sandwich that everyone raves about.  Now, the 411 on the sweet bf's sandwich needs.  He is very particular when it comes to his lunch, especially anything between two slices of bread.  He is Irish, which means he is mayo averse.  V - E - R - Y  I knew that Tootsie's was not the type of lunch spot that would even suggest a slathering of the oily white substance on his sandwich.  Brownie points before we even entered the door.  We both ordered the chicken sandwich which comes dressed with an arugula slaw, and house made potato chips on the side.  Yum.  An ice cold coke in the bottle for him and an iced latte for myself and we were all set to wait for our lunch.  Oh wait!  Last time I was here it was also late in the afternoon- and the Zeppole were all gone, dare I ask again?  Our server was all smiles as he let me know there were 5 left.  O M G.  Did you hear (elbow to the side) that? "I'll take all 5 please"! The service was friendly and relaxing, the atmosphere is fun, and the music was energizing.  We had a good feeling about our visit, and were indeed correct. Our sandwiches were wonderful, crispy, yummy, hot chicken goodness. Balanced perfectly with the slaw and chips.  SO good!  I heart Tootsie's!
Wednesday. Raining cats & dogs. Stanford Doctor Appt. Yawn. Not exactly the blockbuster start to my day... Read more 
Love this place!  The breakfast panino is perfection every time, and the latte is one the best I've ever had.  I tried the granola last week, and it was also outstanding.  Haven't had the lunch offerings, but for a breakfast treat, this is the place.
A quaint little joint with very friendly staff, creative food with an Italian flair, fresh pastries and excellent Danesi coffee. Ate here twice one week while in town on business, arriving within an hour after it opened in the morning and there was no crowd at all. Located right next to the Stanford campus in Palo Alto (wonderful area). Poached egg on toast w/ kalamata olives and celery this morning was incredible!
i kind of love this place and wish i lived closer to Palo Alto just so i could go here every weekend. i love the outdoor seating and the fact that it's located in an old barn. i love that the pastries are set directly at  (my)eye level for viewing pleasure. i love that their ingredients seem fresh. i loved the zucchini fritter, smoked trout salad. the saltiness of the trout was tamed by the nicely dressed frisee. the granita cafe was refreshing and light. the ricotta pancakes were just as i'd imagined them to be. everything that everybody else had looked amazing and i only wished it wouldn't look ridiculously greedy if i'd ordered four dishes for myself. but i kept it at one and anticipate my return.
It's a *little* bit on the pricey side, but I have been twice now and have been very happy and satisfied on both trips.  SUCH a good option if you work on Stanford's Medical Campus, where the offerings are pretty limited.  This is great Italian food, the homemade focaccia is amazing and the soups are awesome too!
I love this place!   The food is wonderful, and it's a nice spot amidst the hustle and bustle of hospital activity.  I will say that today was one of the most frustrating dining experiences that I have ever had.  I selected what I wanted from the selection of yummy-looking items, and went up to the register to order.  I ordered a mocha (which is delicious - beyond anything you can order in a 100 mile radius), and was told they were out of chocolate.  So, no mocha. Fair enough.  Then I ordered what I had just seen behind the glass partition (zucchini layered on top of bread with melted cheese on top), and was told that I couldn't have it, because lunch didn't start until 11am.  It was 10:43 AND it was sitting on that counter with 20 of its buddies on a cookie sheet, just waiting for me to order it.  HUH?  Hey, if you don't have any chocolate left, then can you make an exception and give me at least one of the things I want? And then two minutes later, I saw a lady at a table next to me get a big sandwich and salad-looking dish delivered to her table.  Double HUH? I guess I'll be going at 11am on the mark next time.
the lone brick building definitely looks like a barn. good food.  close to campus.  servers are nice.  line moves pretty fast.  seating limited.  outdoor seating is usually ok in bay area weather. seating is also limited.  ~8$.  can usually find parking reasonable close.  went in a group of 2.
I like this place because parking is easy, the food is high quality but not too expensive, and the food came about 10 minutes after I ordered it.  It is a quaint little place too with a little style and it is cool how the guys there are speaking with an Italian accents.  l'll definitely go there again.
this place is WONDERFUL!!!! Great service, great food and great atmosphere. Being a college kid, (low on cash and time) it was perfect for wonderful tasting food on the GO at a great reasonable price. The tasty food hit te spot and the wonderful staff made my trip even more delightful! thank you so much:)
Great food. Very limited selection.
wonderful little italian cafe.  fresh breads, vegetables, cheeses great, wonderful.  cannot wait for wine in the afternoon.  delightful staff and sweet settings.  need umbrellas outside for shade!  otherwise, goodbye california cafe.
I had a lunch party with a group of 24 coworkers yesterday. I haven't been there before, but decided to try Tootsie's based on yelpers' review. Shannon helped me to arrange an outdoor sittings on the terrace for my party and suggested  that I send orders in advance. Therefore, I sent a list of our orders a day before. Once I arrived, I was surprised since the size of cafe is so small and since they are ready to serve as soon as we arrived. I didn't like the terrace was facing the street side first, but luckily, the street wasn't that busy to bother our nice sunny outdoor lunch. We were able to hear all our speeches without problem. The portion of dishes were small than I've expected. I had Portobello panini sandwich. The mushroom was slightly juicy and the bread was crispy outside. I liked the hint of olive oil and balsamic vinegar flavor in the panini and in the salad. After finishing my plate, I felt full, actually. However, one of my coworkers complained the portion of Lo Spinacio was too small. Yeah, the chicken portion in the Lo Spinacio salad looked so small. Well, it's European!  My another coworker ordered A grumi salad and a pizza, they looked good to me. Their coffee had lots of compliments from all my coworkers. I had a pot of tea, but was a little bit disappointed since their pot wasn't real tea pot. It was a French press, but it didn't work well with only one tea bag of Mighty Leaves even though it is one of my favorite teas. I wish they serve loose tea in a press or serve a tea bag in a real pot. Overall, the lunch party was very successful. It was a quite a retreat to have simple, but tasty food and a cup of deep Italian coffee in a beautiful sunny Nor-Cal weather we missed for a while. I'd love to go back to Tootsie's to enjoy a simple brunch again in another sunny day.
